Ohio, session 136, HB971.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That sections 718.031, 718.08, 3123.89, 3123.90, 3770.03, 3770.06, 3770.07, 3770.071, 3770.073, 3770.10, 3772.01, 3772.02, 3775.01, 3775.02, 3775.03, 3775.04, 3775.041, 3775.051, 3775.06, 3775.09, 3775.10, 3775.12, 3775.14, 3775.15, 3775.16, 3775.99, 5747.01, 5747.062, 5747.063, 5753.01, 5753.07, and 5753.08 be amended and section 3775.051 (3775.05) of the Revised Code be amended for the purpose of adopting a new section number as indicated in parentheses to read as follows: Sec. 718.031. As used in this section, "sports gaming facility" and "type B sports gaming proprietor" have the same meanings as in section 3775.01 of the Revised Code and "video lottery terminal" and "video lottery sales agent" have the same meanings as in section 3770.10 of the Revised Code. (A) A municipal corporation shall require the following persons to withhold and remit municipal income tax with respect to amounts other than qualifying wages as provided in this section: (1) A casino facility or a casino operator, as defined in Section 6(C)(9) of Article XV, Ohio Constitution, and section 3772.01 of the Revised Code, respectively; (2) A video lottery sales agent conducting video lottery terminals on behalf of the state; (3) A type B sports gaming proprietor offering sports gaming at a sports gaming facility. (B) If a person's winnings at a casino facility or sports gaming facility are an amount for which reporting to the internal revenue service of the amount is required by section 6041 of the Internal Revenue Code, as amended, a casino operator or sports gaming proprietor shall deduct and withhold municipal income tax from the person's winnings at the rate of the tax imposed by the municipal corporation in which the casino facility or sports gaming facility is located. (C) Amounts deducted and withheld by a casino operator or sports gaming proprietor are held in trust for the benefit of the municipal corporation to which the tax is owed. (1) On or before the tenth day of each month, the casino operator or sports gaming proprietor shall file a return electronically with the tax administrator of the municipal corporation, providing the name, address, and social security number of the person from whose winnings amounts were deducted and withheld, the amount of each such deduction and withholding during the preceding calendar month, the amount of the winnings from which each such amount was withheld, the type of casino gaming or sports gaming that resulted in such winnings, and any other information required by the tax administrator. With this return, the casino operator or sports gaming proprietor shall remit electronically to the municipal corporation all amounts deducted and withheld during the preceding month. (2) Annually, on or before the thirty-first day of January, a casino operator or sports gaming proprietor shall file an annual return electronically with the tax administrator of the municipal corporation in which the casino facility or sports gaming facility is located, indicating the total amount deducted and withheld during the preceding calendar year. The casino operator or sports gaming proprietor shall remit electronically with the annual return any amount that was deducted and withheld and that was not previously remitted. If the name, address, or social security number of a person or the amount deducted and withheld with respect to that person was omitted on a monthly return for that reporting period, that information shall be indicated on the annual return. (3) Annually, on or before the thirty-first day of January, a casino operator or sports gaming proprietor shall issue an information return to each person with respect to whom an amount has been deducted and withheld during the preceding calendar year. The information return shall show the total amount of municipal income tax deducted from the person's winnings during the preceding year. The casino operator or sports gaming proprietor shall provide to the tax administrator a copy of each information return issued under this division. The administrator may require that such copies be transmitted electronically. (4) A casino operator or sports gaming proprietor that fails to file a return and remit the amounts deducted and withheld shall be personally liable for the amount withheld and not remitted. Such personal liability extends to any penalty and interest imposed for the late filing of a return or the late payment of tax deducted and withheld. (5) If a casino operator or sports gaming proprietor sells the casino facility or sports gaming facility, or otherwise quits the casino or sports gaming business, the amounts deducted and withheld along with any penalties and interest thereon are immediately due and payable. The successor shall withhold an amount of the purchase money that is sufficient to cover the amounts deducted and withheld along with any penalties and interest thereon until the predecessor casino operator or sports gaming proprietor produces either of the following: (a) A receipt from the tax administrator showing that the amounts deducted and withheld and penalties and interest thereon have been paid; (b) A certificate from the tax administrator indicating that no amounts are due. If the successor fails to withhold purchase money, the successor is personally liable for the payment of the amounts deducted and withheld and penalties and interest thereon. (6) The failure of a casino operator or sports gaming proprietor to deduct and withhold the required amount from a person's winnings does not relieve that person from liability for the municipal income tax with respect to those winnings. (D) If a person's prize award from a video lottery terminal is an amount for which reporting to the internal revenue service is required by section 6041 of the Internal Revenue Code, as amended, the video lottery sales agent shall deduct and withhold municipal income tax from the person's prize award at the rate of the tax imposed by the municipal corporation in which the video lottery terminal facility is located. (E) Amounts deducted and withheld by a video lottery sales agent are held in trust for the benefit of the municipal corporation to which the tax is owed. (1) The video lottery sales agent shall issue to a person from whose prize award an amount has been deducted and withheld a receipt for the amount deducted and withheld, and shall obtain from the person receiving a prize award the person's name, address, and social security number in order to facilitate the preparation of returns required by this section. (2) On or before the tenth day of each month, the video lottery sales agent shall file a return electronically with the tax administrator of the municipal corporation providing the names, addresses, and social security numbers of the persons from whose prize awards amounts were deducted and withheld, the amount of each such deduction and withholding during the preceding calendar month, the amount of the prize award from which each such amount was withheld, and any other information required by the tax administrator. With the return, the video lottery sales agent shall remit electronically to the tax administrator all amounts deducted and withheld during the preceding month. (3) A video lottery sales agent shall maintain a record of all receipts issued under division (E) of this section and shall make those records available to the tax administrator upon request. Such records shall be maintained in accordance with section 5747.17 of the Revised Code and any rules adopted pursuant thereto. (4) Annually, on or before the thirty-first day of January, each video lottery sales agent shall file an annual return electronically with the tax administrator of the municipal corporation in which the facility is located indicating the total amount deducted and withheld during the preceding calendar year. The video lottery sales agent shall remit electronically with the annual return any amount that was deducted and withheld and that was not previously remitted. If the name, address, or social security number of a person or the amount deducted and withheld with respect to that person was omitted on a monthly return for that reporting period, that information shall be indicated on the annual return. (5) Annually, on or before the thirty-first day of January, a video lottery sales agent shall issue an information return to each person with respect to whom an amount has been deducted and withheld during the preceding calendar year. The information return shall show the total amount of municipal income tax deducted and withheld from the person's prize award by the video lottery sales agent during the preceding year. A video lottery sales agent shall provide to the tax administrator of the municipal corporation a copy of each information return issued under this division. The tax administrator may require that such copies be transmitted electronically. (6) A video lottery sales agent who fails to file a return and remit the amounts deducted and withheld is personally liable for the amount deducted and withheld and not remitted. Such personal liability extends to any penalty and interest imposed for the late filing of a return or the late payment of tax deducted and withheld. (F) If a video lottery sales agent ceases to operate video lottery terminals, the amounts deducted and withheld along with any penalties and interest thereon are immediately due and payable. The successor of the video lottery sales agent that purchases the video lottery terminals from the agent shall withhold an amount from the purchase money that is sufficient to cover the amounts deducted and withheld and any penalties and interest thereon until the predecessor video lottery sales agent operator produces either of the following: (1) A receipt from the tax administrator showing that the amounts deducted and withheld and penalties and interest thereon have been paid; (2) A certificate from the tax administrator indicating that no amounts are due. If the successor fails to withhold purchase money, the successor is personally liable for the payment of the amounts deducted and withheld and penalties and interest thereon. (G) The failure of a video lottery sales agent to deduct and withhold the required amount from a person's prize award does not relieve that person from liability for the municipal income tax with respect to that prize award. (H) If a casino operator, sports gaming proprietor, or video lottery sales agent files a return late, fails to file a return, remits amounts deducted and withheld late, or fails to remit amounts deducted and withheld as required under this section, the tax administrator of a municipal corporation may impose the following applicable penalty: (1) For the late remittance of, or failure to remit, tax deducted and withheld under this section, a penalty equal to fifty per cent of the tax deducted and withheld; (2) For the failure to file, or the late filing of, a monthly or annual return, a penalty of five hundred dollars for each return not filed or filed late. Interest shall accrue on past due amounts deducted and withheld at the rate prescribed in section 5703.47 of the Revised Code. (I) Amounts deducted and withheld on behalf of a municipal corporation shall be allowed as a credit against payment of the tax imposed by the municipal corporation and shall be treated as taxes paid for purposes of section 718.08 of the Revised Code. This division applies only to the person for whom the amount is deducted and withheld. (J) The tax administrator shall prescribe the forms of the receipts and returns required under this section. Sec. 718.08. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Estimated taxes" means the amount that the taxpayer reasonably estimates to be the taxpayer's tax liability for a municipal corporation's income tax for the current taxable year. (2) "Tax liability" means the total taxes due to a municipal corporation for the taxable year, after allowing any credit to which the taxpayer is entitled, and after applying any estimated tax payment, withholding payment, or credit from another taxable year. (B)(1) Except as provided in division (F) of this section, every taxpayer shall make a declaration of estimated taxes for the current taxable year, on the form prescribed by the tax administrator, if the amount payable as estimated taxes is at least two hundred dollars. For the purposes of this section: (a) Taxes withheld from qualifying wages shall be considered as paid to the municipal corporation for which the taxes were withheld in equal amounts on each payment date unless the taxpayer establishes the dates on which all amounts were actually withheld, in which case the amounts withheld shall be considered as paid on the dates on which the amounts were actually withheld. (b) An overpayment of tax applied as a credit to a subsequent taxable year is deemed to be paid on the date of the postmark stamped on the cover in which the payment is mailed or, if the payment is made by electronic funds transfer, the date the payment is submitted. As used in this division, "date of the postmark" means, in the event there is more than one date on the cover, the earliest date imprinted on the cover by the postal service. (c) Taxes withheld by a casino operator, video lottery sales agent, or type B sports gaming proprietor under section 718.031 of the Revised Code are deemed to be paid to the municipal corporation for which the taxes were withheld on the date the taxes are withheld from the taxpayer's winnings. (2) Except as provided in division (F) of this section, taxpayers filing joint returns shall file joint declarations of estimated taxes. A taxpayer may amend a declaration under rules prescribed by the tax administrator. Except as provided in division (F) of this section, a taxpayer having a taxable year of less than twelve months shall make a declaration under rules prescribed by the tax administrator. (3) The declaration of estimated taxes shall be filed on or before the date prescribed for the filing of municipal income tax returns under division (G) of section 718.05 of the Revised Code or on or before the fifteenth day of the fourth month after the taxpayer becomes subject to tax for the first time. (4) Taxpayers reporting on a fiscal year basis shall file a declaration on or before the fifteenth day of the fourth month after the beginning of each fiscal year or period. (5) The original declaration or any subsequent amendment may be increased or decreased on or before any subsequent quarterly payment day as provided in this section. (C)(1) The required portion of the tax liability for the taxable year that shall be paid through estimated taxes made payable to the municipal corporation or tax administrator, including the application of tax refunds to estimated taxes and withholding on or before the applicable payment date, shall be as follows: (a) On or before the fifteenth day of the fourth month after the beginning of the taxable year, twenty-two and one-half per cent of the tax liability for the taxable year; (b) On or before the fifteenth day of the sixth month after the beginning of the taxable year, forty-five per cent of the tax liability for the taxable year; (c) On or before the fifteenth day of the ninth month after the beginning of the taxable year, sixty-seven and one-half per cent of the tax liability for the taxable year; (d) For an individual, on or before the fifteenth day of the first month of the following taxable year, ninety per cent of the tax liability for the taxable year. For a person other than an individual, on or before the fifteenth day of the twelfth month of the taxable year, ninety per cent of the tax liability for the taxable year. (2) When an amended declaration has been filed, the unpaid balance shown due on the amended declaration shall be paid in equal installments on or before the remaining payment dates. (3) On or before the fifteenth day of the fourth month of the year following that for which the declaration or amended declaration was filed, an annual return shall be filed and any balance which may be due shall be paid with the return in accordance with section 718.05 of the Revised Code. (D)(1) In the case of any underpayment of any portion of a tax liability, penalty and interest may be imposed pursuant to section 718.27 of the Revised Code upon the amount of underpayment for the period of underpayment, unless the underpayment is due to reasonable cause as described in division (E) of this section. The amount of the underpayment shall be determined as follows: (a) For the first payment of estimated taxes each year, twenty-two and one-half per cent of the tax liability, less the amount of taxes paid by the date prescribed for that payment; (b) For the second payment of estimated taxes each year, forty-five per cent of the tax liability, less the amount of taxes paid by the date prescribed for that payment; (c) For the third payment of estimated taxes each year, sixty-seven and one-half per cent of the tax liability, less the amount of taxes paid by the date prescribed for that payment; (d) For the fourth payment of estimated taxes each year, ninety per cent of the tax liability, less the amount of taxes paid by the date prescribed for that payment. (2) The period of the underpayment shall run from the day the estimated payment was required to be made to the date on which the payment is made. For purposes of this section, a payment of estimated taxes on or before any payment date shall be considered a payment of any previous underpayment only to the extent the payment of estimated taxes exceeds the amount of the payment presently required to be paid to avoid any penalty. (E) An underpayment of any portion of tax liability determined under division (D) of this section shall be due to reasonable cause and the penalty imposed by this section shall not be added to the taxes for the taxable year if any of the following apply: (1) The amount of estimated taxes that were paid equals at least ninety per cent of the tax liability for the current taxable year, determined by annualizing the income received during the year up to the end of the month immediately preceding the month in which the payment is due. (2) The amount of estimated taxes that were paid equals at least one hundred per cent of the tax liability shown on the return of the taxpayer for the preceding taxable year, provided that the immediately preceding taxable year reflected a period of twelve months and the taxpayer filed a return with the municipal corporation under section 718.05 of the Revised Code for that year. (3) The taxpayer is an individual who resides in the municipal corporation but was not domiciled there on the first day of January of the calendar year that includes the first day of the taxable year. (F)(1) A tax administrator may waive the requirement for filing a declaration of estimated taxes for any class of taxpayers after finding that the waiver is reasonable and proper in view of administrative costs and other factors. (2) A municipal corporation may, by ordinance or rule, waive the requirement for filing a declaration of estimated taxes for all taxpayers. Sec. 3123.89. (A) The department of job and family services shall develop and implement a real time data match program with the state lottery commission and its lottery sales agents and lottery agents to identify obligors who are subject to a final and enforceable determination of default made under sections 3123.01 to 3123.07 of the Revised Code. (B) Upon the data match program's implementation, the department, in consultation with the commission, shall promulgate rules to facilitate withholding, in appropriate circumstances and in accordance with sections 3770.071 and 3770.074 of the Revised Code, by the commission or its lottery sales agents or lottery agents of an amount sufficient to satisfy any past due support owed by an obligor from a lottery prize award owed to the obligor up to the amount of the award. The rules shall describe an expedited method for withholding, and the time frame for transmission of the amount withheld to the department. (C) As used in this section: (1) "Lottery prize award" includes a prize award from a video lottery terminal but does not include winnings from lottery sports gaming, except for winnings from lottery sports gaming wagers placed through a terminal described in division (B)(3) of section 3770.24 of the Revised Code. (2) "Lottery sports gaming" has the same meaning as in section 3770.23 of the Revised Code. (3) "Video lottery terminal" has the same meaning as in section 3770.21 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3123.90. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Casino facility," "casino operator," and "management company" have the meanings defined in section 3772.01 of the Revised Code. (2) "Sports gaming proprietor" has the meaning defined in section 3775.01 of the Revised Code. (3) "Lottery sports gaming" has the same meaning as in section 3770.23 of the Revised Code. (B) The department of job and family services shall develop and implement a real time data match program with each casino facility's casino operator or management company and with each sports gaming proprietor to identify obligors who are subject to a final and enforceable determination of default made under sections 3123.01 to 3123.07 of the Revised Code. (C) Subject to division (E) of this section, upon Upon the data match program's implementation, if a person receives a payout of winnings at a casino facility or from sports gaming in an amount for which reporting to the internal revenue service of the amount is required by section 6041 of the Internal Revenue Code, as amended, the casino operator, management company, or sports gaming proprietor shall refer to the data match program to determine if the person entitled to the winnings is in default under a support order. If the data match program indicates that the person is in default, the casino operator, management company, or sports gaming proprietor shall withhold from the person's winnings an amount sufficient to satisfy any past due support owed by the obligor identified in the data match up to the amount of the winnings. (D) Not later than fourteen days after withholding the amount, the casino operator, management company, or sports gaming proprietor shall electronically transmit any amount withheld to the department as payment on the support obligation. (E) A sports gaming proprietor that offers lottery sports gaming through a terminal described in division (B)(3) of section 3770.24 of the Revised Code shall not withhold amounts under this section from winnings from wagers placed through that terminal. The state lottery commission shall withhold amounts from those winnings under section 3770.071 of the Revised Code. (F) The department, in consultation with the Ohio casino control commission, may adopt rules under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code as are necessary for implementation of this section. Sec. 3770.03. (A)(1) The state lottery commission shall promulgate rules pursuant to Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, and shall adopt operating procedures, under which a statewide lottery and statewide joint lottery may be conducted, which includes, and since the original enactment of this section has included, the authority for the commission to operate video lottery terminal games and all other lottery games. Any reference in this chapter to tickets shall not be construed to in any way limit the authority of the commission to operate video lottery terminal games or lottery sports gaming. (2) Except regarding matters about which this chapter explicitly requires the commission to promulgate rules under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code, the commission instead may adopt operating procedures for the conduct of lottery games. Those operating procedures shall include, but need not be limited to, the following: (a) The type of lottery to be conducted; (b) The prices of tickets in the lottery; (c) The number, nature, and value of prize awards, the manner and frequency of prize drawings, and the manner in which prizes shall be awarded to holders of winning tickets. (3) The commission shall publish all of its operating procedures on its official web site and shall make copies of its operating procedures available to the public upon request. (4) An operating procedure adopted under this section is not considered a rule under section 111.15 of the Revised Code. (5) All rules of the commission that are in effect on the effective date of this amendment October 3, 2023, remain effective unless the commission rescinds them. (B) The commission shall promulgate rules pursuant to Chapter 119. of the Revised Code concerning all of the following: (1) The locations at which lottery tickets may be sold and the manner in which they are to be sold. These rules may authorize the sale of lottery tickets by commission personnel or other licensed individuals from traveling show wagons at the state fair, and at any other expositions the director of the commission considers acceptable. These rules shall prohibit commission personnel or other licensed individuals from soliciting from an exposition the right to sell lottery tickets at that exposition, but shall allow commission personnel or other licensed individuals to sell lottery tickets at an exposition if the exposition requests commission personnel or licensed individuals to do so. These rules may also address the accessibility of sales agent locations to commission products in accordance with the "Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990," 104 Stat. 327, 42 U.S.C. 12101 et seq. (2) The manner in which lottery sales revenues are to be collected, including authorization for the director to impose penalties for failure by lottery sales agents to transfer revenues to the commission in a timely manner; (3) The amount of compensation to be paid to licensed lottery sales agents; (4) The substantive criteria for the licensing of lottery sales agents consistent with section 3770.05 of the Revised Code, and procedures for revoking or suspending their licenses consistent with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. If circumstances, such as the nonpayment of funds owed by a lottery sales agent, or other circumstances related to the public safety, convenience, or trust, require immediate action, the director may suspend a license without affording an opportunity for a prior hearing under section 119.07 of the Revised Code. (5) Special game rules to implement any agreements signed by the governor that the director enters into with other lottery jurisdictions under division (J) of section 3770.02 of the Revised Code to conduct statewide joint lottery games. The rules shall require that the entire net proceeds of those games that remain, after associated operating expenses, prize disbursements, lottery sales agent bonuses, commissions, and reimbursements, and any other expenses necessary to comply with the agreements or the rules are deducted from the gross proceeds of those games, be transferred to the lottery profits education fund under division (B) of section 3770.06 of the Revised Code. (6) Rules establishing any of the following with respect to the operation of video lottery terminal games: (a) Any fees, fines, or payment schedules; (b) Any voluntary exclusion program. (C) Chapter 2915. of the Revised Code does not apply to, affect, or prohibit lotteries conducted pursuant to this chapter. (D) The commission may promulgate rules pursuant to Chapter 119. of the Revised Code that establish any standards governing the display of advertising and celebrity images on lottery tickets and on other items that are used in the conduct of, or to promote, the statewide lottery and statewide joint lottery games. Any revenue derived from the sale of advertising displayed on lottery tickets and on those other items shall be considered, for purposes of section 3770.06 of the Revised Code, to be related proceeds in connection with the statewide lottery or gross proceeds from statewide joint lottery games, as applicable. (E)(1) The commission shall meet with the director at least once each month and shall convene other meetings at the request of the chairperson or any five of the members. No action taken by the commission shall be binding unless at least five of the members present vote in favor of the action. A written record shall be made of the proceedings of each meeting and shall be transmitted forthwith to the governor, the president of the senate, the senate minority leader, the speaker of the house of representatives, and the house minority leader. (2) The director shall present to the commission a report each month, showing the total revenues, prize disbursements, and operating expenses of the state lottery for the preceding month. As soon as practicable after the end of each fiscal year, the commission shall prepare and transmit to the governor and the general assembly a report of lottery revenues, prize disbursements, and operating expenses for the preceding fiscal year and any recommendations for legislation considered necessary by the commission. Sec. 3770.06. (A) There is hereby created the state lottery gross revenue fund, which shall be in the custody of the treasurer of state but shall not be part of the state treasury. All gross revenues received from sales of lottery tickets, fines, fees, and related proceeds in connection with the statewide lottery, all gross proceeds of lottery sports gaming described in sections 3770.23 to 3770.25 of the Revised Code, and all gross proceeds from statewide joint lottery games, shall be deposited into the fund. The treasurer of state shall invest any portion of the fund not needed for immediate use in the same manner as, and subject to all provisions of law with respect to the investment of, state funds. The treasurer of state shall disburse money from the fund on order of the director of the state lottery commission or the director's designee. Except for gross proceeds from statewide joint lottery games, all revenues of the state lottery gross revenue fund that are not paid to holders of winning lottery tickets, that are not required to meet short-term prize liabilities, that are not credited to lottery sales agents in the form of bonuses, commissions, or reimbursements, that are not paid to financial institutions to reimburse those institutions for sales agent nonsufficient funds, and that are collected from sales agents for remittance to insurers under contract to provide sales agent bonding services shall be transferred to the state lottery fund, which is hereby created in the state treasury. In addition, all revenues of the state lottery gross revenue fund that represent the gross proceeds from the statewide joint lottery games and that are not paid to holders of winning lottery tickets, that are not required to meet short-term prize liabilities, that are not credited to lottery sales agents in the form of bonuses, commissions, or reimbursements, and that are not necessary to cover operating expenses associated with those games or to otherwise comply with the agreements signed by the governor that the director enters into under division (J) of section 3770.02 of the Revised Code or the rules the commission adopts under division (B)(5) of section 3770.03 of the Revised Code shall be transferred to the state lottery fund. All investment earnings of the fund shall be credited to the fund. Moneys shall be disbursed from the fund pursuant to vouchers approved by the director. Total disbursements for monetary prize awards to holders of winning lottery tickets in connection with the statewide lottery, other than lottery sports gaming, and purchases of goods and services awarded as prizes to holders of winning lottery tickets shall be of an amount equal to at least fifty per cent of the total revenue accruing from the sale of lottery tickets. (B) Pursuant to Section 6 of Article XV, Ohio Constitution, there is hereby established in the state treasury the lottery profits education fund. Whenever, in the judgment of the director of the state lottery commission, the amount to the credit of the state lottery fund that does not represent proceeds from statewide joint lottery games is in excess of that needed to meet the maturing obligations of the commission and as working capital for its further operations, the director of the state lottery commission shall recommend the amount of the excess to be transferred to the lottery profits education fund, and the director of budget and management may transfer the excess to the lottery profits education fund in connection with the statewide lottery. In addition, whenever, in the judgment of the director of the state lottery commission, the amount to the credit of the state lottery fund that represents proceeds from statewide joint lottery games equals the entire net proceeds of those games as described in division (B)(5) of section 3770.03 of the Revised Code and the rules adopted under that division, the director of the state lottery commission shall recommend the amount of the proceeds to be transferred to the lottery profits education fund, and the director of budget and management may transfer those proceeds to the lottery profits education fund. Investment earnings of the lottery profits education fund shall be credited to the fund. The lottery profits education fund shall be used solely for the support of elementary, secondary, vocational, and special education programs as determined in appropriations made by the general assembly, or as provided in applicable bond proceedings for the payment of debt service on obligations issued to pay costs of capital facilities, including those for a system of common schools throughout the state pursuant to section 2n of Article VIII, Ohio Constitution. When determining the availability of money in the lottery profits education fund, the director of budget and management may consider all balances and estimated revenues of the fund. (C) There is hereby established in the state treasury the deferred prizes trust fund. With the approval of the director of budget and management, an amount sufficient to fund annuity prizes shall be transferred from the state lottery fund and credited to the trust fund. The treasurer of state shall credit all earnings arising from investments purchased under this division to the trust fund. Within sixty days after the end of each fiscal year, the treasurer of state shall certify to the director of budget and management whether the actuarial amount of the trust fund is sufficient over the fund's life for continued funding of all remaining deferred prize liabilities as of the last day of the fiscal year just ended. Also, within that sixty days, the director of budget and management shall certify the amount of investment earnings necessary to have been credited to the trust fund during the fiscal year just ending to provide for such continued funding of deferred prizes. Any earnings credited in excess of the latter certified amount shall be transferred to the lottery profits education fund. To provide all or a part of the amounts necessary to fund deferred prizes awarded by the commission in connection with the statewide lottery, the treasurer of state, in consultation with the commission, may invest moneys contained in the deferred prizes trust fund which represents proceeds from the statewide lottery in obligations of the type permitted for the investment of state funds but whose maturities are thirty years or less. Notwithstanding the requirements of any other section of the Revised Code, to provide all or part of the amounts necessary to fund deferred prizes awarded by the commission in connection with statewide joint lottery games, the treasurer of state, in consultation with the commission, may invest moneys in the trust fund which represent proceeds derived from the statewide joint lottery games in accordance with the rules the commission adopts under division (B)(5) of section 3770.03 of the Revised Code. Investments of the trust fund are not subject to the provisions of division (A)(11) of section 135.143 of the Revised Code limiting to twenty-five per cent the amount of the state's total average portfolio that may be invested in debt interests other than commercial paper and limiting to five per cent the amount that may be invested in debt interests, including commercial paper, of a single issuer. All purchases made under this division shall be effected on a delivery versus payment method and shall be in the custody of the treasurer of state. The treasurer of state may retain an investment advisor, if necessary. The commission shall pay any costs incurred by the treasurer of state in retaining an investment advisor. (D) The auditor of state shall conduct annual audits of all funds and any other audits as the auditor of state or the general assembly considers necessary. The auditor of state may examine all records, files, and other documents of the commission, and records of lottery sales agents that pertain to their activities as agents, for purposes of conducting authorized audits. (E) The state lottery commission shall establish an internal audit plan before the beginning of each fiscal year, subject to the approval of the office of internal audit in the office of budget and management. At the end of each fiscal year, the commission shall prepare and submit an annual report to the office of internal audit for the office's review and approval, specifying the internal audit work completed by the end of that fiscal year and reporting on compliance with the annual internal audit plan. (F) Whenever, in the judgment of the director of budget and management, an amount of net state lottery proceeds is necessary to be applied to the payment of debt service on obligations, all as defined in sections 151.01 and 151.03 of the Revised Code, the director shall transfer that amount directly from the state lottery fund or from the lottery profits education fund to the bond service fund defined in those sections. The provisions of this division are subject to any prior pledges or obligation of those amounts to the payment of bond service charges as defined in division (C) of section 3318.21 of the Revised Code, as referred to in division (B) of this section. Sec. 3770.07. (A)(1) Except as provided in division (A)(2) of this section, lottery prize awards shall be claimed by the holder of the winning lottery product, or by the executor or administrator, or the trustee of a trust, of the estate of a deceased holder of a winning lottery product, in a manner to be determined by the state lottery commission, within one hundred eighty days after the date on which the prize award was announced if the lottery game is an online game, or within one hundred eighty days after the close of the game if the lottery game is an instant game, and within one hundred eighty days after the end of the sporting event or series of sporting events on which the wager was placed if the lottery game is lottery sports gaming. Any lottery prize award with a value that meets or exceeds the reportable winnings amounts set by 26 U.S.C. 6041, or a subsequent analogous section of the Internal Revenue Code, shall not be claimed by or paid to any person, as defined in section 1.59 of the Revised Code or as defined by rule or order of the state lottery commission, until the name, address, and social security number of each beneficial owner of the prize award are documented for the commission. Except when a beneficial owner otherwise consents in writing, in the case of a claim for a lottery prize award made by one or more beneficial owners using a trust, the name, address, and social security number of each such beneficial owner in the commission's records as a result of such a disclosure are confidential and shall not be subject to inspection or copying under section 149.43 of the Revised Code as a public record. Except as otherwise provided in division (A)(1) of this section or as otherwise provided by law, the name and address of any individual claiming a lottery prize award are subject to inspection or copying under section 149.43 of the Revised Code as a public record. (2) An eligible person serving on active military duty in any branch of the United States armed forces during a war or national emergency declared in accordance with federal law may submit a delayed claim for a lottery prize award. The eligible person shall do so by notifying the state lottery commission about the claim not later than the three hundred sixtieth day after the applicable deadline specified under division (A)(1) of this section. (3) If no valid claim to a lottery prize award is made within the prescribed period, the prize money, the cost of goods and services awarded as prizes, or, if goods or services awarded as prizes are resold by the state lottery commission, the proceeds from their sale shall be returned to the state lottery fund and distributed in accordance with section 3770.06 of the Revised Code. (4) The state lottery commission may share with other governmental agencies the name, address, and social security number of a beneficial owner disclosed to the commission under division (A)(1) of this section, as authorized under sections 3770.071 and 3770.073 of the Revised Code. Any shared information as disclosed pursuant to those sections that is made confidential by division (A)(1) of this section remains confidential and shall not be subject to inspection or copying under section 149.43 of the Revised Code as a public record unless the applicable beneficial owner otherwise provides written consent. (5) As used in this division: (a) "Eligible person" means a person who is entitled to a lottery prize award and who falls into either of the following categories: (i) While on active military duty in this state, the person, as the result of a war or national emergency declared in accordance with federal law, is transferred out of this state before the applicable deadline specified under division (A)(1) of this section. (ii) While serving in the reserve forces in this state, the person, as the result of a war or national emergency declared in accordance with federal law, is placed on active military duty and is transferred out of this state before the applicable deadline specified under division (A)(1) of this section. (b) "Active military duty" means that a person is covered by the "Servicemembers Civil Relief Act," 117 Stat. 2835 (2003), 50 U.S.C. 501 et seq., as amended, or the "Uniformed Services Employment and Reemployment Rights Act of 1994," 108 Stat. 3149, 38 U.S.C. 4301 et seq., as amended. (c) "Each beneficial owner" means the ultimate recipient or, if there is more than one, each ultimate recipient of a lottery prize award. (B) If a prize winner, as defined in section 3770.10 of the Revised Code, is under eighteen years of age or, in the case of lottery sports gaming, under twenty-one years of age, or is under some other legal disability, and the prize money or the cost of goods or services awarded as a prize exceeds one thousand dollars, the director of the state lottery commission shall order that payment be made to the order of the legal guardian of that prize winner. If the amount of the prize money or the cost of goods or services awarded as a prize is one thousand dollars or less, the director may order that payment be made to the order of the adult member, if any, of that prize winner's family legally responsible for the care of that prize winner. (C) No right of any prize winner, as defined in section 3770.10 of the Revised Code, to a prize award shall be the subject of a security interest or used as collateral. (D)(1) No right of any prize winner, as defined in section 3770.10 of the Revised Code, to a prize award shall be assignable except as follows: when the payment is to be made to the executor or administrator, or the trustee of a trust, of the estate of a prize winner; when the award of a prize is disputed, any person may be awarded a prize award to which another has claimed title, pursuant to the order of a court of competent jurisdiction; when a person is awarded a prize award to which another has claimed title, pursuant to the order of a federal bankruptcy court under Title 11 of the United States Code; or as provided in sections 3770.10 to 3770.14 of the Revised Code. (2)(a) No right of any prize winner, as defined in section 3770.10 of the Revised Code, to a prize award with a remaining unpaid balance of less than one hundred thousand dollars shall be subject to garnishment, attachment, execution, withholding, or deduction except as provided in sections 3119.80, 3119.81, 3121.02, 3121.03, and 3123.06 of the Revised Code or when the director is to make a payment pursuant to section 3770.071 or 3770.073 of the Revised Code. (b) No right of any prize winner, as defined in section 3770.10 of the Revised Code, to a prize award with an unpaid balance of one hundred thousand dollars or more shall be subject to garnishment, attachment, execution, withholding, or deduction except as follows: as provided in sections 3119.80, 3119.81, 3121.02, 3121.03, and 3123.06 of the Revised Code; when the director is to make a payment pursuant to section 3770.071 or 3770.073 of the Revised Code; or pursuant to the order of a court of competent jurisdiction located in this state in a proceeding in which the state lottery commission is a named party, in which case the garnishment, attachment, execution, withholding, or deduction pursuant to the order shall be subordinate to any payments to be made pursuant to section 3119.80, 3119.81, 3121.02, 3121.03, 3123.06, 3770.071, or 3770.073 of the Revised Code. (3) The state lottery commission may adopt and amend rules pursuant to Chapter 119. of the Revised Code as necessary to implement division (D) of this section, to provide for payments from prize awards subject to garnishment, attachment, execution, withholding, or deduction, and to comply with any applicable requirements of federal law. (4) Upon making payments from a prize award as required by division (D) of this section, the director and the state lottery commission are discharged from all further liability for those payments, whether they are made to an executor, administrator, trustee, judgment creditor, or another person, or to the prize winner, as defined in section 3770.10 of the Revised Code. (5) The state lottery commission shall adopt rules pursuant to section 3770.03 of the Revised Code concerning the payment of prize awards upon the death of a prize winner, as defined in section 3770.10 of the Revised Code. Upon the death of a prize winner, the remainder of the prize winner's prize award, to the extent it is not subject to a transfer agreement under sections 3770.10 to 3770.14 of the Revised Code, may be paid to the executor, administrator, or trustee in the form of a discounted lump sum cash settlement. (E) No lottery prize award shall be awarded to or for any officer or employee of the state lottery commission, any officer or employee of the auditor of state actively auditing, coordinating, or observing commission drawings, or any blood relative or spouse of such an officer or employee of the commission or auditor of state living as a member of the officer's or employee's household, nor shall any such officer, employee, blood relative, or spouse attempt to claim a lottery prize award. (F) The director may prohibit vendors to the state lottery commission and their employees from being awarded a lottery prize award. (G) Upon the payment of prize awards pursuant to a provision of this section, other than a provision of division (D) of this section, the director and the state lottery commission are discharged from all further liability for their payment. Installment payments of lottery prize awards shall be paid by official check or warrant, and they shall be sent by mail delivery to the prize winner's address within the United States or by electronic funds transfer to an established bank account located within the United States, or the prize winner may pick them up at an office of the commission. Sec. 3770.071. (A) As used in this section, "lottery prize award" does not include a prize award from a video lottery terminal and does not include winnings from lottery sports gaming, except that "lottery prize award" includes winnings from lottery sports gaming wagers placed through a terminal described in division (B)(3) of section 3770.24 of the Revised Code. (B) If the amount of the prize money or the cost of goods or services awarded as a lottery prize award meets or exceeds the reportable winnings amounts set by 26 U.S.C. 6041, or a subsequent analogous section of the Internal Revenue Code, the director of the state lottery commission or the director's designee shall consult the data match program established under section 3123.89 of the Revised Code to determine whether the person is subject to a final and enforceable determination of default made under sections 3123.01 to 3123.07 of the Revised Code. If so, the director or the director's designee shall withhold an amount from the prize award in accordance with section 3123.89 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3770.073. (A) As used in this section, "lottery prize award" does not include a prize award from a video lottery terminal and does not include winnings from lottery sports gaming, except that "lottery prize award" includes winnings from lottery sports gaming wagers placed through a terminal described in division (B)(3) of section 3770.24 of the Revised Code. (B) The attorney general shall provide the state lottery commission or its designee with access to the real time data match program described in sections 3772.37 and 3775.16 of the Revised Code for the purpose of identifying prize winners who owe amounts to the state or a political subdivision. (C) If a person is entitled to a lottery prize award and is indebted to the state for the payment of any tax, workers' compensation premium, unemployment contribution, payment in lieu of unemployment contribution, or certified claim under section 131.02 or 131.021 of the Revised Code, is indebted to a political subdivision that has a certified claim under section 131.02 of the Revised Code, owes lottery sales receipts held in trust on behalf of the state lottery commission as described in division (H)(4) of section 3770.05 of the Revised Code, or owes any charge, penalty, or interest arising from any of those debts and if the amount of the prize money or the cost of goods or services awarded as a lottery prize award meets or exceeds the reportable winnings amount set by 26 U.S.C. 6041, the director of the state lottery commission, or the director's designee, shall do either of the following: (1) If the prize award will be paid in a lump sum, deduct from the prize award and pay to the attorney general an amount in satisfaction of the debt and pay any remainder to that person. If the amount of the prize award is less than the amount of the debt, the entire amount of the prize award shall be deducted and paid in partial satisfaction of the debt. (2) If the prize award will be paid in annual installments, on the date the initial installment payment is due, deduct from that installment and pay to the attorney general an amount in satisfaction of the debt and, if necessary to collect the full amount of the debt, do the same for any subsequent annual installments, at the time the installments become due and owing to the person, until the debt is fully satisfied. (D) If a person entitled to a lottery prize award owes more than one debt, any debt owed to the state shall be satisfied first, subject to both section 5739.33 and division (G) of section 5747.07 of the Revised Code having first priority, and subject to division (E) of this section. (E) Any debt owed under section 3770.071 of the Revised Code shall be satisfied with first priority over debts owed under this section. (F) Except as provided in section 131.021 of the Revised Code, this section applies only to debts that have become final. Sec. 3770.10. As used in sections 3770.07 to 3770.075 and 3770.10 to 3770.14 of the Revised Code: (A) "Court of competent jurisdiction" means either the general division or the probate division of the court of common pleas of the county in which the prize winner resides, or, if the prize winner is not a resident of this state, either the general division or the probate division of the court of common pleas of Franklin county or a federal court having jurisdiction over the lottery prize award. (B) "Discounted present value" means the present value of the future payments of a lottery prize award that is determined by discounting those payments to the present, using the most recently published applicable federal rate for determining the present value of an annuity as issued by the United States internal revenue service and assuming daily compounding. (C) "Independent professional advice" means the advice of a licensed professional adviser if all of the following apply: (1) The prize winner has engaged the services of the licensed professional adviser to render advice concerning the legal, financial, and other implications of a transfer of the lottery prize award. (2) The licensed professional adviser is not affiliated in any manner with or compensated in any manner by the transferee of the lottery prize award. (3) The compensation of the licensed professional adviser is not affected by whether or not a transfer of a lottery prize award occurs. (D) "Prize winner" means any person that holds the right to receive all or any part of a lottery prize award as a result of being any of the following: (1) A person who is a claimant under division (A) of section 3770.07 of the Revised Code; (2) A person who is entitled to a prize award and who is under a legal disability as described in division (B) of section 3770.07 of the Revised Code; (3) A person who was awarded a prize award to which another has claimed title by a federal bankruptcy court order or other court order referred to in division (D) of section 3770.07 of the Revised Code; (4) A person who is receiving payments upon the death of a prize winner as provided in division (D) of section 3770.07 of the Revised Code. (E) "Transfer" means any form of sale, assignment, or redirection of payment of the remainder of a lottery prize award for consideration. (F) "Transfer agreement" means an agreement that is complete and valid, and that provides for the transfer of the remainder of a lottery prize award from a prize winner to a transferee. A transfer agreement is incomplete and invalid unless the agreement contains both of the following: (1) A statement, signed by the prize winner under penalties of perjury, that the prize winner irrevocably agrees that the prize winner is subject to the tax imposed by Chapter 5733. or 5747. of the Revised Code with respect to gain or income which the prize winner will recognize in connection with the transfer. (2) A statement, signed by the transferee, that the transferee irrevocably agrees that the transferee is subject to the withholding requirements imposed by division (C) of section 3770.072 of the Revised Code and that the transferee is subject to the tax imposed by Chapter 5733. or 5747. of the Revised Code with respect to gain or income which the transferee will recognize in connection with a lottery prize award to be received as a result of the transfer. If the transferee is a pass-through entity, as defined in section 5733.04 of the Revised Code, each investor in the pass-through entity shall also sign under penalties of perjury a statement setting forth that the investor irrevocably agrees that the investor is subject to the withholding requirements imposed by division (C) of section 3770.072 of the Revised Code and is subject to the tax imposed by Chapter 5733. or 5747. of the Revised Code with respect to gain or income which the transferee and the investor will recognize in connection with a lottery prize award to be received as a result of the transfer. (G) "Transferee" means a party acquiring or proposing to acquire the remainder of a lottery prize award from a prize winner through a transfer. (H) "Licensed professional adviser" means any of the following: (1) An attorney; (2) A certified public accountant; (3) An actuary; (4) A financial planner who is accredited by a nationally recognized accreditation agency. (I) "Lottery prize award" includes winnings from lottery sports gaming, except as otherwise specified in the applicable section of the Revised Code. (J) "Video lottery terminal" has the same meaning as in section 3770.21 of the Revised Code. (K)(J) "Video lottery sales agent" means an agent of the state lottery authorized to operate video lottery terminals under section 3770.21 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3772.01. As used in this chapter: (A) "Applicant" means any person who applies to the commission for a license under this chapter. (B) "Casino control commission fund" means the casino control commission fund described in Section 6(C)(3)(d) of Article XV, Ohio Constitution, the money in which shall be used to fund the commission and its related affairs. (C) "Casino facility" means a casino facility as defined in Section 6(C)(9) of Article XV, Ohio Constitution. (D) "Casino game" means any slot machine or table game as defined in this chapter. (E) "Casino gaming" means any type of slot machine or table game wagering, using money, casino credit, or any representative of value, authorized in any of the states of Indiana, Michigan, Pennsylvania, and West Virginia as of January 1, 2009, and includes slot machine and table game wagering subsequently authorized by, but shall not be limited by, subsequent restrictions placed on such wagering in such states. "Casino gaming" does not include bingo, as authorized in Section 6 of Article XV, Ohio Constitution and conducted as of January 1, 2009; horse racing where the pari-mutuel system of wagering is conducted, as authorized under the laws of this state as of January 1, 2009; or sports gaming. (F) "Casino gaming employee" means any employee of a casino operator or management company, but not a key employee, and as further defined in section 3772.131 of the Revised Code. (G) "Casino operator" means any person, trust, corporation, partnership, limited partnership, association, limited liability company, or other business enterprise that directly or indirectly holds an ownership or leasehold interest in a casino facility. "Casino operator" does not include an agency of the state, any political subdivision of the state, any person, trust, corporation, partnership, limited partnership, association, limited liability company, or other business enterprise that may have an interest in a casino facility, but who is legally or contractually restricted from conducting casino gaming. (H) "Central system" means a computer system that provides the following functions related to casino gaming equipment used in connection with casino gaming authorized under this chapter: security, auditing, data and information retrieval, and other purposes deemed necessary and authorized by the commission. (I) "Cheat" means to alter the result of a casino game, the element of chance, the operation of a machine used in a casino game, or the method of selection of criteria that determines (a) the result of the casino game, (b) the amount or frequency of payment in a casino game, (c) the value of a wagering instrument, or (d) the value of a wagering credit. "Cheat" does not include an individual who, without the assistance of another individual or without the use of a physical aid or device of any kind, uses the individual's own ability to keep track of the value of cards played and uses predictions formed as a result of the tracking information in the individual's playing and betting strategy. (J) "Commission" means the Ohio casino control commission. (K) "Gaming agent" means a peace officer employed by the commission that is vested with duties to enforce this chapter and conduct other investigations into the conduct of the casino gaming and the maintenance of the equipment that the commission considers necessary and proper and is in compliance with section 109.77 of the Revised Code. (L) "Gaming-related vendor" means any individual, partnership, corporation, association, trust, or any other group of individuals, however organized, who supplies gaming-related equipment, goods, or services to a casino operator or management company, that are directly related to or affect casino gaming authorized under this chapter, including, but not limited to, the manufacture, sale, distribution, or repair of slot machines and table game equipment. (M) "Holding company" means any corporation, firm, partnership, limited partnership, limited liability company, trust, or other form of business organization not a natural person which directly or indirectly does any of the following: (1) Has the power or right to control a casino operator, management company, or gaming-related vendor license applicant or licensee; (2) Holds an ownership interest of five per cent or more, as determined by the commission, in a casino operator, management company, or gaming-related vendor license applicant or licensee; (3) Holds voting rights with the power to vote five per cent or more of the outstanding voting rights of a casino operator, management company, or gaming-related vendor applicant or licensee. (N) "Initial investment" includes costs related to demolition, engineering, architecture, design, site preparation, construction, infrastructure improvements, land acquisition, fixtures and equipment, insurance related to construction, and leasehold improvements. (O) "Institutional investor" means any of the following entities owning five per cent or more, but less than twenty-five per cent, of an ownership interest in a casino facility, casino operator, management company, or holding company: a corporation, bank, insurance company, pension fund or pension fund trust, retirement fund, including funds administered by a public agency, employees' profit-sharing fund or employees' profit-sharing trust, any association engaged, as a substantial part of its business or operations, in purchasing or holding securities, including a hedge fund, mutual fund, or private equity fund, or any trust in respect of which a bank is trustee or cotrustee, investment company registered under the "Investment Company Act of 1940," 15 U.S.C. 80a-1 et seq., collective investment trust organized by banks under Part Nine of the Rules of the Comptroller of the Currency, closed-end investment trust, chartered or licensed life insurance company or property and casualty insurance company, investment advisor registered under the "Investment Advisors Act of 1940," 15 U.S.C. 80 b-1 et seq., and such other persons as the commission may reasonably determine to qualify as an institutional investor for reasons consistent with this chapter, and that does not exercise control over the affairs of a licensee and its ownership interest in a licensee is for investment purposes only, as set forth in division (F) of section 3772.10 of the Revised Code. (P) "Key employee" means any executive, employee, agent, or other individual who has the power to exercise significant influence over decisions concerning any part of the operation of a person that has applied for or holds a casino operator, management company, or gaming-related vendor license or the operation of a holding company of a person that has applied for or holds a casino operator, management company, or gaming-related vendor license, including: (1) An officer, director, trustee, partner, or an equivalent fiduciary; (2) An individual who holds a direct or indirect ownership interest of five per cent or more; (3) An individual who performs the function of a principal executive officer, principal operating officer, principal accounting officer, or an equivalent officer; (4) Any other individual the commission determines to have the power to exercise significant influence over decisions concerning any part of the operation. (Q) "Licensed casino operator" means a casino operator that has been issued a license by the commission and that has been certified annually by the commission to have paid all applicable fees, taxes, and debts to the state. (R) "Majority ownership interest" in a license or in a casino facility, as the case may be, means ownership of more than fifty per cent of such license or casino facility, as the case may be. For purposes of the foregoing, whether a majority ownership interest is held in a license or in a casino facility, as the case may be, shall be determined under the rules for constructive ownership of stock provided in Treas. Reg. 1.409A-3(i)(5)(iii) as in effect on January 1, 2009. (S) "Management company" means an organization retained by a casino operator to manage a casino facility and provide services such as accounting, general administration, maintenance, recruitment, and other operational services. (T) "Ohio law enforcement training fund" means the state law enforcement training fund described in Section 6(C)(3)(f) of Article XV, Ohio Constitution, the money in which shall be used to enhance public safety by providing training opportunities to the law enforcement community. (U) "Person" includes, but is not limited to, an individual or a combination of individuals; a sole proprietorship, a firm, a company, a joint venture, a partnership of any type, a joint-stock company, a corporation of any type, a corporate subsidiary of any type, a limited liability company, a business trust, or any other business entity or organization; an assignee; a receiver; a trustee in bankruptcy; an unincorporated association, club, society, or other unincorporated entity or organization; entities that are disregarded for federal income tax purposes; and any other nongovernmental, artificial, legal entity that is capable of engaging in business. (V) "Problem casino gambling and addictions fund" means the state problem gambling and addictions fund described in Section 6(C)(3)(g) of Article XV, Ohio Constitution, the money in which shall be used for treatment of problem gambling and substance abuse, and for related research. (W) "Promotional gaming credit" means a slot machine or table game credit, discount, or other similar item issued to a patron to enable the placement of, or increase in, a wager at a slot machine or table game. (X) "Slot machine" means any mechanical, electrical, or other device or machine which, upon insertion of a coin, token, ticket, or similar object, or upon payment of any consideration, is available to play or operate, the play or operation of which, whether by reason of the skill of the operator or application of the element of chance, or both, makes individual prize determinations for individual participants in cash, premiums, merchandise, tokens, or any thing of value, whether the payoff is made automatically from the machine or in any other manner, but does not include any device that is a skill-based amusement machine, or an electronic instant bingo system, as defined in section 2915.01 of the Revised Code. (Y) "Table game" means any game played with cards, dice, or any mechanical, electromechanical, or electronic device or machine for money, casino credit, or any representative of value. "Table game" does not include slot machines. (Z) "Upfront license" means the first plenary license issued to a casino operator. (AA) "Voluntary exclusion program" means a program provided by the commission that allows persons to voluntarily exclude themselves from the gaming areas of facilities under the jurisdiction of the commission by placing their name on a voluntary exclusion list and following the procedures set forth by the commission. (BB) "Sports gaming," "sports gaming proprietor," "sports gaming facility," "sporting event," "mobile management services provider," and "management services provider" have the same meanings as in section 3775.01 of the Revised Code. A person is considered to be involved in a sporting event if division (F)(3) of section 3775.13 of the Revised Code applies to the person with respect to that sporting event. Sec. 3772.02. (A) There is hereby created the Ohio casino control commission described in Section 6(C)(4) of Article XV, Ohio Constitution. (B) The commission shall consist of seven members appointed within one month of September 10, 2010, by the governor with the advice and consent of the senate. The governor shall forward all appointments to the senate within twenty-four hours. (1) Each commission member is eligible for reappointment at the discretion of the governor. No commission member shall be appointed for more than three terms in total. (2) Each commission member shall be a resident of Ohio. (3) At least one commission member shall be experienced in law enforcement and criminal investigation. (4) At least one commission member shall be a certified public accountant experienced in accounting and auditing. (5) At least one commission member shall be an attorney admitted to the practice of law in Ohio. (6) At least one commission member shall be a resident of a county where one of the casino facilities is located. (7) Not more than four commission members shall be of the same political party. (8) No commission member shall have any affiliation with an Ohio casino operator or facility or with a sports gaming proprietor, mobile management services provider, or management services provider licensed under Chapter 3775. of the Revised Code. (C) Commission members shall serve four-year terms, except that when the governor makes initial appointments to the commission under this chapter, the governor shall appoint three members to serve four-year terms with not more than two such members from the same political party, two members to serve three-year terms with such members not being from the same political party, and two members to serve two-year terms with such members not being from the same political party. (D) Each commission member shall hold office from the date of appointment until the end of the term for which the member was appointed. Any member appointed to fill a vacancy occurring before the expiration of the term for which the member's predecessor was appointed shall hold office for the remainder of the unexpired term. Any member shall continue in office after the expiration date of the member's term until the member's successor takes office, or until a period of sixty days has elapsed, whichever occurs first. A vacancy in the commission membership shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointment. (E) The governor shall select one member to serve as chairperson and the commission members shall select one member from a different party than the chairperson to serve as vice-chairperson. The governor may remove and replace the chairperson at any time. No such member shall serve as chairperson for more than six successive years. The vice-chairperson shall assume the duties of the chairperson in the absence of the chairperson. The chairperson and vice-chairperson shall perform but shall not be limited to additional duties as are prescribed by commission rule. (F) A commission member is not required to devote the member's full time to membership on the commission. Beginning on September 29, 2015, each member of the commission shall receive compensation of fifty thousand dollars per year. Beginning July 1, 2016, each member of the commission shall receive compensation of forty thousand dollars per year. Beginning July 1, 2017, each member of the commission shall receive compensation of thirty thousand dollars per year. Each member shall receive the member's actual and necessary expenses incurred in the discharge of the member's official duties. (G) The governor shall not appoint an individual to the commission, and an individual shall not serve on the commission, if the individual is ineligible to be appointed or retained under section 3772.07 of the Revised Code. A member who comes under indictment or bill of information of an offense that, if the member were convicted of the offense, would make the member ineligible to be appointed or retained under that section shall resign from the commission immediately upon indictment. (H) At least five commission members shall be present for the commission to meet. The concurrence of four members is necessary for the commission to take any action. All members shall vote on the adoption of rules, and the approval of, and the suspension or revocation of, the licenses of casino operators or management companies, unless a member has a written leave of absence filed with and approved by the chairperson. (I) A commission member may be removed or suspended from office in accordance with section 3.04 of the Revised Code. (J) Each commission member, before entering upon the discharge of the member's official duties, shall make an oath to uphold the Ohio Constitution and laws of the state of Ohio and shall give a bond, payable by the commission, to the treasurer of state, in the sum of ten thousand dollars with sufficient sureties to be approved by the treasurer of state, which bond shall be filed with the secretary of state. (K) The commission shall hold one regular meeting each month and shall convene other meetings at the request of the chairperson or a majority of the members. A member who fails to attend at least three-fifths of the regular and special meetings of the commission during any two-year period forfeits membership on the commission. All meetings of the commission shall be open meetings under section 121.22 of the Revised Code except as otherwise allowed by law. (L) The commission is exempt from the requirements of sections 101.82 to 101.87 of the Revised Code. Sec. 3775.01. As used in this chapter: (A) "Applicant" means a person that applies to the Ohio casino control commission for a license under this chapter. (B) "Casino operator" has "Casino operator," "licensed casino operator," and "casino facility" have the same meaning meanings as in section 3772.01 of the Revised Code. (C) "Collegiate sport or athletic event" means a sport or athletic event offered or sponsored by, or played in connection with, a public or private institution that offers educational services beyond the secondary level. (D) "Commission" means the Ohio casino control commission. (E) "Esports event" means an organized video game competition that is regulated by a sports governing body and that is held between professional players who play individually or as teams. (F) "Lottery sports gaming" has the same meaning as in section 3770.23 of the Revised Code. (G)(1) "Mobile management services provider" means a person that contracts with a type A sports gaming proprietor under section 3775.05 of the Revised Code to operate sports gaming on behalf of the sports gaming proprietor and that is licensed by the Ohio casino control commission as a mobile management services provider under that section. (2) "Management services provider" means a person that contracts with a type B sports gaming proprietor under section 3775.051 3775.05 of the Revised Code to operate sports gaming on behalf of the sports gaming proprietor and that is licensed by the Ohio casino control commission as a management services provider under that section. (H)(G) "Official league data" means statistics, results, outcomes, and other data related to a sporting event provided by the appropriate sports governing body or its designee. (I) "Online sports pool" means sports gaming in which a wager on a sporting event is made through a computer or mobile device and accepted through an online gaming web site that is operated by a type A sports gaming proprietor or mobile management services provider. (J)(H) "Professional sport or athletic event" means an event at which two or more persons participate in sports or athletic events and receive compensation, or the potential for compensation based on their performance, in excess of actual expenses for their participation in the event. (K) "Professional sports organization" means any of the following: (1) The owner of a professional sports team in this state that is a member of the national football league, the national hockey league, major league baseball, major league soccer, or the national basketball association; (2) The owner of a sports facility in this state that hosts an annual tournament on the professional golf association tour or a wholly owned for-profit subsidiary of the owner, if the owner is a nonprofit corporation or organization; (3) A promoter of a national association for stock car auto racing national touring race conducted in this state. (L)(I) "Promotional gaming credit" means a credit, discount, or other similar item issued to a patron to enable the placement of, or increase in, a wager on a sporting event. (M)(J) "Proposition bet" means a wager on a sporting event that is based on whether an identified instance or statistical achievement will occur, will be achieved, or will be surpassed, other than the score or outcome of the sporting event or parts of the sporting event, such as quarters, halves, periods, or innings. (N)(1) Except as otherwise provided in divisions (N)(2) and (3) of this section, "sporting (K)(1) "Sporting event" means a match, game, race, athletic contest, or other organized competitive activity, the individual performance statistics of athletes or participants in such an event, or a combination of those. (2) "Authorized sporting event" means any professional sport or athletic event, any collegiate sport or athletic event, any Olympic or international sports competition event, any motor race event, any esports event, or any other special event the Ohio casino control commission authorizes for sports gaming, the individual performance statistics of athletes or participants in such an event, or a combination of those. (2) "Sporting (a) "Authorized sporting event" does not include a collegiate sport or athletic event, an event for primary or secondary school students, whether conducted or sponsored by a primary or secondary school or by another person, or the individual performance statistics of athletes or participants in such an event. (3) "Sporting (b) "Authorized sporting event" includes an event that involves athletes or participants who are under eighteen years of age, or the individual performance statistics of athletes or participants in the event, only if the Ohio casino control commission authorizes the event for sports gaming. (O)(1)(L)(1) "Sports gaming" means the business of accepting wagers on sporting events. (2) Except as otherwise provided in division (O)(3)(L)(3) of this section and in section 3770.25 of the Revised Code, "authorized sports gaming" includes means sports gaming conducted using any system or method of wagering on authorized sporting events that the Ohio casino control commission approves, including exchange wagering, parlays, spreads, over-under, moneyline, in-game wagering, single game bets, teaser bets, in-play bets, proposition bets, pools, pari-mutuel sports wagering pools, or straight bets, and not including parlays, in-game wagering, in-play bets, or proposition bets. (3) "Sports gaming" does and "authorized sports gaming" do not include any of the following: (a) Wagering on horse racing; (b) Lottery games authorized under Chapter 3770. of the Revised Code, including video lottery terminals, other than lottery sports gaming authorized under sections 3770.23 to 3770.25 of the Revised Code; (c) Casino gaming authorized under division (C) of Section 6 of Article XV, Ohio Constitution and Chapter 3772. of the Revised Code; (d) Fantasy contests authorized under Chapter 3774. of the Revised Code. (P)(M) "Sports gaming equipment" means any of the following that directly relate to or affect, or are used or consumed in, the operation of sports gaming: (1) Any mechanical, electronic, or other device, mechanism, or equipment, including a self-service sports gaming terminal; (2) Any software, application, components, or other goods; (3) Anything to be installed or used on a patron's personal device. (Q)(N) "Sports gaming facility" means a designated area of a building or structure casino facility in which patrons may place wagers on sporting events with a type B sports gaming proprietor either in person or using self-service sports gaming terminals. (R)(O) "Sports gaming license" means a sports gaming proprietor license, a mobile management services provider license, a management services provider license, a sports gaming occupational license, a type C sports gaming host license, or a sports gaming supplier license issued by the Ohio casino control commission under this chapter. (S)(P) "Sports gaming licensee" means a person who holds a valid sports gaming license. (T)(Q) "Sports gaming proprietor" means a person licensed by the Ohio casino control commission to offer sports gaming in this state as a type A, type B, or type C sports gaming proprietor. (U)(R) "Sports gaming receipts" has the same meaning as in section 5753.01 of the Revised Code. (V)(1)(S)(1) "Sports gaming supplier" means a person or entity that provides sports gaming equipment or related services to a sports gaming proprietor, mobile management services provider, or management services provider, including providing services, directly or indirectly, that are necessary to create a betting market or to determine bet outcomes. (2) A sports gaming supplier that provides sports gaming equipment or services to be used through a sports gaming proprietor, mobile management services provider, or management services provider is not considered a sports gaming proprietor, mobile management services provider, or management services provider solely on that basis. (3) A sports governing body that provides official league data concerning its own sporting event to a sports gaming proprietor, mobile management services provider, management services provider, or sports gaming supplier is not considered a sports gaming supplier solely on that basis. (W)(T) "Sports gaming voluntary exclusion program" means the program described in division (B)(11) of section 3775.02 of the Revised Code. (X)(U) "Sports governing body" means a regional, national, or international organization having ultimate authority over the rules and codes of conduct with respect to a sporting event and the participants in the sporting event. (Y) "Type A sports gaming proprietor" means a sports gaming proprietor licensed by the Ohio casino control commission to offer sports gaming through an online sports pool. (Z) "Type B sports gaming proprietor" means a sports gaming proprietor licensed by the Ohio casino control commission to offer sports gaming at a sports gaming facility. (AA) "Type C sports gaming proprietor" means a sports gaming proprietor licensed by the Ohio casino control commission to offer sports gaming through self-service or clerk-operated sports gaming terminals located at type C sports gaming hosts' facilities. (BB) "Type C sports gaming host" means the owner of a facility with an A-1-A, A-1c, D-1, D-2, or D-5 liquor permit issued under Chapter 4303. of the Revised Code who is licensed by the Ohio casino control commission to offer sports gaming at the facility through a type C sports gaming proprietor. (CC) "Video lottery sales agent" means an agent of the state lottery authorized to operate video lottery terminals under section 3770.21 of the Revised Code. (DD) (V) "Wager" or "bet" means to risk a sum of money or thing of value on an uncertain occurrence. (W) "In-game wager" or "in-play bet" means a wager or bet placed on a sporting event after play of the sporting event begins and before play of the sporting event ends. Sec. 3775.02. (A) The Ohio casino control commission shall have jurisdiction over all persons conducting or participating in the conduct of sports gaming authorized by as described in this chapter or by sections 3770.23 to 3770.25 of the Revised Code, including the authority to license, regulate, investigate, and penalize those persons in a manner that is consistent with the commission's authority with respect to casino gaming. In all cases in which this chapter requires or allows the commission to adopt rules concerning sports gaming, the commission shall adopt those rules under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code. (B) The commission shall adopt rules that include all of the following: (1) Procedures for a sports gaming proprietor to accept wagers on a sporting event or series of sporting events; (2) The types of wagering tickets sports gaming proprietors are to use; (3) The manner in which sports gaming proprietors are to issue tickets; (4) The type of records sports gaming licensees are to keep; (5) The system to be used to place a wager with a sports gaming proprietor; (6) The manner in which sports gaming proprietors must verify that their patrons are at least twenty-one years of age; (7) Protections for a player placing a wager with a sports gaming proprietor; (8) Measures to promote responsible sports gaming; (9) Penalties and fines for violating this section or rules adopted under this section; (10) Restrictions to ensure that sports gaming proprietors' advertisements for sports gaming meet all of the following requirements: (a) They clearly convey the conditions under which sports gaming is being offered, including information about the cost to participate and the nature of any promotions and information to assist patrons in understanding the odds of winning; (b) They disclose the identity of the sports gaming proprietor and, if applicable, the mobile management services provider or management services provider; (c) They do not target individuals under twenty-one years of age, other individuals who are ineligible to participate in sports gaming, problem gamblers, or other vulnerable individuals; (d) They include messages designed to prevent problem gambling and provide information about how to access resources related to problem gambling; (e) They are not false, misleading, or deceptive to a reasonable consumer. (f) They are not displayed within the venue of a collegiate sport or athletic event. (g) They are not broadcast in conjunction with any live broadcast of a sporting event. (11) A sports gaming voluntary exclusion program, which shall allow a person to voluntarily exclude the person's self from participating in sports gaming conducted under this chapter by placing the person's name on a voluntary exclusion list and following procedures set forth by the commission. (a) All of the following apply to the sports gaming voluntary exclusion program: (i) Except as provided by the commission by rule, a person who participates in the program shall agree to refrain from participating in sports gaming conducted under this chapter. (ii) The name of a person participating in the program shall be included on a list of persons excluded from participating in sports gaming conducted under this chapter. (iii) Except as provided by the commission by rule, no person who participates in the program shall petition the commission for admittance into a sports gaming facility or for permission to participate in sports gaming conducted under this chapter. (iv) The list of persons participating in the program and the personal information of those persons shall be confidential and shall only be disseminated by the commission to the state lottery commission, to a sports gaming proprietor and its agents and employees for purposes of enforcement, and to other entities, upon request of the participant and agreement by the commission. (v) A sports gaming proprietor shall make all reasonable attempts as determined by the commission to cease all direct marketing efforts to a person participating in the program. (vi) A sports gaming proprietor shall not cash the check of a person participating in the program or extend credit to the person in any manner. However, the program shall not exclude a sports gaming proprietor from seeking the payment of a debt accrued by a person before participating in the program. (vii) Any and all locations at which a person may register as a participant in the program shall be published. (b) The commission shall determine, by rule, whether a participant in the sports gaming voluntary exclusion program also automatically becomes a participant in the voluntary exclusion program established under Chapter 3772. of the Revised Code. The state lottery commission shall determine, by rule, whether a participant in the sports gaming voluntary exclusion program also automatically becomes a participant in any voluntary exclusion program established under Chapter 3770. of the Revised Code. (12) A procedure by which a sports governing body may request anonymized sports gaming data from a sports gaming proprietor if the sports governing body believes that the integrity of one of its sporting events is in question. (13) A procedure by which a state university may request anonymized sports gaming data from a sports gaming proprietor for the purpose of conducting research to assist the commission in ensuring the integrity of sports gaming or to improve state-funded services related to responsible gambling and problem gambling. The data are not a public record, and the state university shall not disclose the data to any person, except for the purpose of conducting the research described in this division, as part of a peer-reviewed research report, or pursuant to an agreement between the state university and the sports gaming proprietor. As used in this division, "state university" has the same meaning as in section 3345.011 of the Revised Code. (14) Any other procedure or thing the commission determines necessary to ensure the integrity of sports gaming regulated by the commission. (C)(1) The commission may, independently or at the request of any person, including a sports governing body, adopt rules to prohibit or restrict sports gaming proprietors from accepting wagers on a particular sporting event or to prohibit or restrict sports gaming proprietors from accepting a particular type of wager. (2) The commission shall adopt rules prescribing a process by which the commission may prohibit or restrict sports gaming proprietors from accepting wagers on a particular sporting event or prohibit or restrict sports gaming proprietors from accepting a particular type of wager on a temporary emergency basis instead of by rule. (3)(a) A sports governing body may formally request the commission to prohibit or restrict sports gaming proprietors from accepting wagers on a particular sporting event or to prohibit or restrict sports gaming proprietors from accepting a particular type of wager. The sports governing body shall submit the formal request in the form and manner prescribed by the commission. Upon receiving the request, the commission promptly shall send written notice of the request to every sports gaming proprietor and shall consider any timely response submitted by a sports gaming proprietor. (b) If the commission determines that the sports governing body has shown good cause through its formal request to grant the requested prohibition or restriction, the commission promptly shall adopt the prohibition or restriction. (c) If the commission determines that the sports governing body has not shown good cause through its formal request to grant the requested prohibition or restriction, the commission promptly shall provide the sports governing body with notice and an opportunity for a hearing to offer further evidence in support of granting the requested prohibition or restriction. (D) The commission shall adopt rules establishing minimum internal control standards for the administration of sports gaming proprietors' operations, sports gaming equipment, systems, or other items used by sports gaming proprietors to conduct sports gaming, and the maintenance of sports gaming proprietors' financial records and other required records. The commission may approve minimum internal control standards proposed by sports gaming proprietors. (E)(1) The commission shall approve all sports gaming equipment and each form, variation, or composite of sports gaming to be used by sports gaming proprietors. (2)(a) Before approving a piece of sports gaming equipment or a form, variation, or composite of sports gaming, the commission shall require it to undergo scientific testing or technical evaluation, as the commission determines appropriate. The commission may require the testing or evaluation to be conducted at the expense of the sports gaming supplier or sports gaming proprietor, as applicable, by an independent testing laboratory certified by the commission. (b) The commission may certify an independent testing laboratory to test and evaluate sports gaming equipment and forms, variations, or composites of sports gaming if both of the following apply: (i) The laboratory is competent and qualified to scientifically test and technically evaluate sports gaming equipment and forms, variations, or composites of sports gaming for compliance with this chapter and with the rules of the commission and otherwise to perform the functions assigned to the laboratory by the commission; (ii) The laboratory is not owned or controlled by, is not affiliated with, and does not have any interest in a sports gaming proprietor, mobile management services provider, management services provider, sports gaming supplier, or sports governing body. (c) The commission shall adopt rules prescribing the certification standards, fees, and duties that apply to a certified independent testing laboratory under division (E) of this section. (3) The commission shall adopt rules requiring sports gaming licensees and sports gaming facilities to use only approved sports gaming equipment acquired from a licensed sports gaming supplier and to use only approved forms, variations, or composites of sports gaming. (F)(1) The commission shall determine a person's eligibility to hold or renew a sports gaming license under this chapter, shall issue all sports gaming licenses, and shall maintain a record of all sports gaming licenses issued under this chapter. (2) The commission shall conduct a complete investigation of each applicant for a sports gaming license to determine whether the applicant meets the requirements of this chapter and of the commission's rules each time the applicant applies for an initial or renewed sports gaming license. The commission may initiate an additional licensing investigation or adjudication or reopen an existing licensing investigation or adjudication at any time. (G)(1) Except as otherwise provided in divisions (G)(2) and (3) of this section, the commission shall levy and collect all fees and surcharges imposed under this chapter and rules adopted under this chapter and shall deposit all moneys collected in the casino control commission fund created under section 5753.03 of the Revised Code. (2) Of the license fees described in division (E)(C) of section 3775.04, and division (B)(3) of section 3775.05, and division (B)(3) of section 3775.051 of the Revised Code, the commission shall deposit one half one-half of one per cent in the sports gaming profits veterans fund created under section 5902.22 of the Revised Code and shall deposit the remainder in the sports gaming revenue fund created under section 5753.031 of the Revised Code. (3) The commission shall levy and collect fines for noncriminal violations of the provisions of this chapter and of rules adopted under this chapter and shall deposit all such fines in the sports gaming revenue fund created under section 5753.031 of the Revised Code. (H)(1) The commission, in an adjudication conducted under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code and in accordance with section 3772.04 of the Revised Code, may do any of the following: (a) Penalize or fine any sports gaming licensee, applicant for a sports gaming license, or other person who is subject to the commission's jurisdiction under this chapter; (b) Limit, condition, restrict, suspend, revoke, deny, or refuse to renew any sports gaming license. (2) The executive director of the commission may issue an emergency order with respect to sports gaming under division (G) of section 3772.04 of the Revised Code. (I)(1) The commission shall monitor all sports gaming conducted in this state by sports gaming proprietors, or shall contract with an independent integrity monitoring provider for that purpose, in order to identify any unusual betting activities or patterns that may indicate a need for further investigation. The commission shall require each sports gaming proprietor to participate in the monitoring system as part of the minimum internal control standards described in division (D) of this section. (2) The information in the monitoring system described in division (I)(1) of this section is not a public record. The commission may disclose the information in the monitoring system only as necessary for investigative or law enforcement purposes or pursuant to a court order. (J)(1) The executive director of the commission promptly shall report to the commission any facts or circumstances related to the operation of a sports gaming licensee that constitute a violation of state or federal law and immediately report any suspicious wagering to the appropriate state or federal authorities. (2) The commission shall cooperate with any investigation conducted by a law enforcement agency or sports governing body, including by providing, or facilitating the provision of, wagering information and audio or video files related to persons placing wagers, provided that the commission shall not be required to provide any information to a sports governing body that would jeopardize an ongoing criminal investigation. (3) A sheriff, chief of police, or prosecuting attorney shall furnish to the commission, on forms prescribed by the commission, any information obtained concerning any apparent violation of this chapter or rules adopted under this chapter. If the information is considered a confidential law enforcement investigatory record under section 149.43 of the Revised Code, the commission shall not disclose the information to the public. (K)(1) The attorney general has a civil cause of action to restrain any violation of this chapter or of rules adopted under this chapter. Upon the request of the commission or its executive director, the attorney general shall commence and prosecute such an action to completion. The court shall give priority to such an action over all other civil actions. (2) An action brought under division (K)(1) of this section does not preclude an administrative or criminal proceeding on the same facts. (3) The attorney general may enter into an agreement with a state or local law enforcement agency to carry out the duties described in division (K)(1) of this section. Sec. 3775.03. (A)(1) Except as otherwise provided in division (A)(2) of this section, no (A) No person shall operate, conduct, or assist in operating or conducting sports gaming in this state without first obtaining an appropriate sports gaming license from the Ohio casino control commission. (2) The state lottery commission is not required to receive a sports gaming license in order to operate lottery sports gaming under sections 3770.23 to 3770.25 of the Revised Code. (B) Each person applying for an initial or renewed sports gaming license issued under this chapter, other than a type C sports gaming host license, and each individual who has control of the applicant as described in division (C) of this section, shall submit two complete sets of fingerprints to the commission for the purpose of conducting a criminal records check, including obtaining any available information from the federal bureau of investigation. The person shall provide the fingerprints using a method the superintendent of the bureau of criminal identification and investigation prescribes pursuant to division (C)(2) of section 109.572 of the Revised Code and fill out the form the superintendent of the bureau of criminal identification and investigation prescribes pursuant to division (C)(1) of section 109.572 of the Revised Code. Upon receiving an application under this section, the executive director of the Ohio casino control commission shall request the superintendent of the bureau of criminal identification and investigation, or a vendor approved by the bureau, to conduct a criminal records check based on the fingerprint impressions in accordance with division (A)(19) of section 109.572 of the Revised Code. Any fee required under division (C)(3) of section 109.572 of the Revised Code shall be paid by the applicant, or in the case of an occupational license, by the applicant's employer. Any applicant convicted of any disqualifying offense, as defined in section 3772.07 of the Revised Code, shall not be issued a license. (C) The Ohio casino control commission shall not grant a sports gaming proprietor, mobile management services provider, management services provider, or sports gaming supplier license until it has determined that each person who has control of the applicant has met the qualifications for sports gaming licensure established in this chapter and in rules adopted by the commission. All of the following persons are considered to have control of an applicant: (1) Each person associated with a corporate applicant, including any corporate holding company, parent company, or subsidiary company of the applicant, that has the ability to control the activities of the corporate applicant or elect a majority of the board of directors of that corporation, other than any bank or other licensed lending institution that holds a mortgage or other lien acquired in the ordinary course of business; (2) Each person associated with a noncorporate applicant that directly or indirectly holds a beneficial or proprietary interest in the applicant's business operation or that the commission otherwise determines has the ability to control the applicant; (3) Key personnel of an applicant, including any executive, employee, or agency, having the power to exercise significant influence over decisions concerning any part of the applicant's business operation. (D) A sports gaming proprietor, mobile management services provider, or management services provider shall display its license conspicuously in its place of business or have the license available for inspection by any agent of the Ohio casino control commission or any law enforcement agency. Each holder of an occupational license issued under section 3775.06 of the Revised Code shall have an indicator of licensure prominently displayed when present in a sports gaming facility at all times, in accordance with the rules of the commission. Each type C sports gaming host shall display its license conspicuously in its place of business. (E) A sports gaming licensee shall give the Ohio casino control commission written notice within ten days of any material change to any information provided in the licensee's application for a license or renewal. The commission shall specify by rule which changes to that information it considers to be material. Sec. 3775.04. (A)(1) A type A sports gaming proprietor license authorizes a sports gaming proprietor to offer sports gaming through one or more online sports pools. (2)(a) Except as otherwise provided under division (A)(2)(b) of this section, the Ohio casino control commission shall license not more than twenty-five type A sports gaming proprietors at any one time. (b) When twenty-five type A sports gaming proprietors are licensed in this state, the commission may issue additional type A sports gaming proprietor licenses to eligible applicants who demonstrate to the commission that the sports gaming market in this state needs additional type A sports gaming proprietors. (3) A type A sports gaming proprietor shall meet at least one of the following requirements at all times: (a) The type A sports gaming proprietor also shall operate a sports gaming facility under a type B sports gaming proprietor license. (b) The type A sports gaming proprietor shall maintain at least one operational place of business in this state at which the sports gaming proprietor regularly maintains multiple employees. (4) The commission shall adopt by rule a procedure allowing the commission to revoke a type A sports gaming proprietor license if the licensee does not offer sports gaming to patrons under the license for a continuous period of one year or more. (B)(1) A type B sports gaming proprietor license authorizes a sports gaming proprietor to offer sports gaming at one sports gaming facility at a location casino facility specified on the license. (2) The commission shall license not more than forty type B sports gaming proprietors at any one time. (3)(a)(i) Except as otherwise provided in division (B)(3)(a)(ii) of this section, no sports gaming facility shall be located in a county with a population of less than one hundred thousand, as determined by the 2010 federal decennial census. (ii) The commission may issue an initial or renewed type B sports gaming proprietor license for one sports gaming facility to be located in a county with a population of fifty thousand or more, but less than one hundred thousand, as determined by the 2010 federal decennial census, at any one time, if the commission determines, in consultation with the department of development, that the county received at least five million visitors for purposes of tourism during the most recent calendar year for which the necessary data are available. (b)(i) Except as otherwise provided in division (B)(3)(b)(ii) of this section, not more than one sports gaming facility shall be located in a county with a population of one hundred thousand or more, but less than four hundred thousand, as determined by the 2010 federal decennial census, at any one time. (ii) Not more than two sports gaming facilities shall be located in a county with a population of one hundred thousand or more, but less than four hundred thousand, as determined by the 2010 federal decennial census, at any one time, if a video lottery sales agent operates video lottery terminals at a facility in the county. (c) Not more than three sports gaming facilities shall be located in a county with a population of four hundred thousand or more, but less than eight hundred thousand, as determined by the 2010 federal decennial census, at any one time. (d) Not more than five sports gaming facilities shall be located in a county with a population of eight hundred thousand or more, as determined by the 2010 federal decennial census, at any one time. (4) (2) The commission shall issue an initial type B a sports gaming proprietor license only to a person who conducts significant economic activity in the county in which the sports gaming facility is to be located, as determined by the commission in consultation with the department of development licensed casino operator. (C)(1) A type C sports gaming proprietor license authorizes a sports gaming proprietor to offer sports gaming through self-service or clerk-operated sports gaming terminals located at one or more type C sports gaming hosts' facilities under section 3770.25 of the Revised Code. (2) The commission shall license at least two, and not more than twenty, type C sports gaming proprietors at any one time. However, if only one eligible and suitable person applies for a type C sports gaming proprietor license, the commission shall issue the license. (D)(B) An applicant for an initial or renewed type A, type B, or type C sports gaming proprietor license shall do all of the following: (1) Submit a written application on a form furnished by the commission.; (a) If the application is for an initial type B sports gaming proprietor license, the application shall specify both of the following: (i) The intended location of the sports gaming facility or, at a minimum, the county in which the sports gaming facility is to be located if the license is granted; (ii) The expected overall capital investment in the sports gaming facility, including its size, furnishings, and equipment. (b) If the application is for a renewed type B sports gaming proprietor license, the application shall specify one of the following, as applicable: (i) If the sports gaming proprietor does not intend to relocate the sports gaming facility, the location of the sports gaming facility; (ii) If the sports gaming proprietor intends to relocate the sports gaming facility, the intended new location of the sports gaming facility or, at a minimum, the county in which the sports gaming facility is to be located if the renewal is granted. (2) Pay the fee required under division (C)(3) of section 109.572 of the Revised Code, along with a nonrefundable application fee in an amount prescribed by the commission by rule; (3) Submit an audit of the applicant's financial transactions and the condition of the applicant's total operations for the previous fiscal year prepared by a certified public accountant in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles and state and federal laws; (4) Satisfy any other requirements for licensure under this chapter and rules adopted under this chapter. (E)(C) After receiving a sports gaming proprietor license, the sports gaming proprietor shall pay the following nonrefundable license fees, as applicable, not later than the dates indicated, and shall give to the state a surety bond, in an amount and in the form approved by the commission, to guarantee that the sports gaming proprietor faithfully makes all payments required by this chapter and rules adopted under this chapter during the period of the license: (1) For an initial or renewed type A sports gaming proprietor license: 1 2 3 4 5 6 A Upon issuance of license One year after license issued Two years after license issued Three years after license issued Four years after license issued B Initial or renewed license - type A sports gaming proprietor that is a professional sports organization and that is not contracting with more than one mobile management services provider $500,000 $125,000 $125,000 $125,000 $125,000 C Initial or renewed license - any other type A sports gaming proprietor that is not contracting with more than one mobile management services provider $750,000 $187,500 $187,500 $187,500 $187,500 D Initial license - type A sports gaming proprietor that is a professional sports organization and that is contracting with two mobile management services providers $1,666,667 $416,667 $416,667 $416,667 $416,667 E Initial license - any other type A sports gaming proprietor that is contracting with two mobile management services providers $2,500,000 $625,000 $625,000 $625,000 $625,000 F Renewed license - type A sports gaming proprietor that is a professional sports organization and that is contracting with two mobile management services providers $500,000 $125,000 $125,000 $125,000 $125,000 G Renewed license - any other type A sports gaming proprietor that is contracting with two mobile management services providers $750,000 $187,500 $187,500 $187,500 $187,500 (2) For an initial or renewed type B sports gaming proprietor license: 1 2 3 4 5 6 A Upon issuance of license One year after license issued Two years after license issued Three years after license issued Four years after license issued B Type B sports gaming proprietor that is also a type A sports gaming proprietor $100,000 $10,000 $10,000 $10,000 $10,000 C Type B sports gaming proprietor that is not also a type A sports gaming proprietor $50,000 $10,000 $10,000 $10,000 $10,000 (3) For a type C sports gaming proprietor license, one hundred thousand dollars upon being issued an initial license and twenty-five thousand dollars upon being issued a renewed license. (F)(1)(D)(1) A sports gaming proprietor license shall be valid for a term of five years. (2) Upon the expiration of a sports gaming proprietor license, the sports gaming proprietor may apply to renew the license in the same manner as for an initial license, unless the license is suspended or revoked or the commission determines that the sports gaming proprietor is not in compliance with this chapter and the rules adopted under this chapter. Sec. 3775.041. (A) In issuing initial and renewed type A and type B sports gaming proprietor licenses, the Ohio casino control commission shall give preference to applicants that are professional sports organizations, casino operators, or video lottery sales agents, subject to the factors described in divisions (B) and (C) of this section, as applicable. The commission shall give equal preference to professional sports organizations, casino operators, and video lottery sales agents for that purpose. (B) In issuing initial and renewed sports gaming proprietor, mobile management services provider, management services provider, and sports gaming supplier licenses, the commission shall consider all of the following factors, in addition to all other requirements for licensure specified under this chapter and in the rules of the commission: (1) (A) The reputation, experience, and financial integrity of the applicant and any person that controls the applicant, as determined under division (C) of section 3775.03 of the Revised Code; (2) (B) The financial ability of the applicant to purchase and maintain adequate liability and casualty insurance and to provide an adequate surety bond; (3) (C) The past and present compliance of the applicant and its affiliates or affiliated companies with gambling-related licensing requirements in this state or any other jurisdiction, including whether the applicant has a history of noncompliance with those requirements; (4) (D) Whether the applicant has been charged with, indicted for, or convicted of any felony or misdemeanor criminal offense under the laws of any jurisdiction, not including any traffic violation; (5) (E) Whether the applicant has filed, or had filed against it, a proceeding for bankruptcy, or has ever been involved in any formal process to adjust, defer, suspend, or otherwise work out the payment of any debt; (6) (F) Whether the applicant has been served with a complaint or other notice filed with any public body regarding a payment of any tax required under federal, state, or local law that has been delinquent for one or more years; (7) (G) Whether the applicant is or has been a defendant in litigation involving its business practices; (8) (H) Whether awarding a license would undermine the public's confidence in the sports gaming industry in this state. (C) In the case of a sports gaming proprietor license, the Ohio casino control commission also shall consider all of the following: (1) The nature of the applicant's current or intended physical presence in this state, including any expenditures for physical infrastructure; (2) The length of time, if any, for which the applicant has been doing any kind of business in this state; (3) The total amount of taxable income the applicant pays, or will pay, to its employees in this state; (4) The applicant's current or intended local and statewide economic involvement in this state; (5) The applicant's other current or intended contributions to this state, including promoting tourism. (D) Notwithstanding any contrary provision of division (A), (B), or (C) of this section, the Ohio casino control commission shall not give preference to an applicant for a sports gaming proprietor license on the basis that any of the following persons currently contract, or have contracted, with the state lottery commission or any other agency of this state: (1) The applicant; (2) A person that has control over the applicant, as determined under division (C) of section 3775.03 of the Revised Code; (3) A person over which the applicant has control, as determined under that division. Sec. 3775.051 3775.05. (A)(1) (A) A type B sports gaming proprietor may contract with one management services provider to offer sports gaming at a sports gaming facility on the sports gaming proprietor's behalf, in a manner authorized under the contract. (2)(a) If the holder of a type B sports gaming proprietor license is a professional sports organization and is a member of a league, association, or organization that prevents the holder from being subject to the regulatory control of the Ohio casino control commission or from otherwise operating under the license, the professional sports organization may contractually appoint a designee operator that is considered the management services provider for all aspects of commission oversight and operating under the license. The professional sports organization shall not have control over the management services provider, and the management services provider shall not have control over the professional sports organization, as determined by the commission under division (C) of section 3775.03 of the Revised Code. (b) A professional sports organization and a management services provider described in division (A)(2)(a) of this section shall not exchange any information that may compromise the integrity of sporting events or of sports gaming. The commission shall adopt by rule procedures for the professional sports organization and the management services provider to follow to ensure the integrity of sporting events and of sports gaming, including procedures to prevent any exchange of information or conflict of interest between the professional sports organization and the management services provider. (3) A type C sports gaming proprietor shall not contract with a mobile management services provider or a management services provider to offer sports gaming under the type C sports gaming proprietor license on the sports gaming proprietor's behalf. (4) A management services provider may offer sports gaming only in accordance with this chapter, with the rules adopted by the Ohio casino control commission under this chapter, and with the nature of the sports gaming proprietor's license. (B)(1) A management services provider shall be licensed under this section before entering into a contract with a type B sports gaming proprietor as described in division (A) of this section. A management services provider license entitles the holder to contract with one type B sports gaming proprietor. An applicant for an initial or renewed management services provider license shall meet all requirements for licensure established by the commission by rule and shall pay the fee required under division (C)(3) of section 109.572 of the Revised Code, along with a nonrefundable application fee in an amount determined by the commission by rule. (2) The commission may accept another jurisdiction's license, if the commission determines it has similar licensing requirements, as evidence that the applicant meets the requirements for a license issued under this section. (3) After receiving an initial or renewed management services provider license, the applicant shall pay the following nonrefundable license fees, as applicable, not later than the dates indicated: 1 2 3 4 5 6 A Upon issuance of license One year after license issued Two years after license issued Three years after license issued Four years after license issued B Management services provider that is contracting with a type B sports gaming proprietor that is also a type A sports gaming proprietor $100,000 $10,000 $10,000 $10,000 $10,000 C Any other management services providerInitial or renewed license $50,000 $10,000 $10,000 $10,000 $10,000 (C) A management services provider license shall be valid for a term of five years. In order to renew a management services provider license, the licensee shall apply to the commission for a renewed license in the same manner as for an initial license. (D) In order to permit a management services provider to offer sports gaming on behalf of a type B sports gaming proprietor, the sports gaming proprietor and the management services provider shall enter into a written contract that has been approved by the commission. If the sports gaming proprietor and the management services provider wish to make a material change to the contract, the sports gaming proprietor first shall submit the change to the commission for its approval or rejection. The sports gaming proprietor or the management services provider shall not assign, delegate, subcontract, or transfer the management service provider's duties and responsibilities under the contract to a third party. (E)(1) Subject to division (E)(2) of this section, the provisions of this chapter concerning a type B sports gaming proprietor apply to a management services provider that contracts with the sports gaming proprietor with respect to all rights, duties, and liabilities of the sports gaming proprietor assigned, delegated, subcontracted, or transferred to the management services provider as though the management services provider were a type B sports gaming proprietor. Unless the context requires otherwise, references in the Revised Code to a sports gaming proprietor apply to a management services provider to the extent that the management services provider is acting on behalf of a type B sports gaming proprietor pursuant to the contract. (2) Division (E)(1) of this section does not permit a management services provider to operate sports gaming other than pursuant to a contract with a type B sports gaming proprietor to operate sports gaming on behalf of the sports gaming proprietor. (F) The commission shall adopt a rule setting a maximum number of management services provider licenses a person may hold at any one time. Sec. 3775.06. (A)(1) An individual whose duties include any of the following shall hold an appropriate and valid sports gaming occupational license issued by the Ohio casino control commission at all times: (a) Accepting wagers on sporting events on behalf of a sports gaming proprietor; (b) Handling money as part of operating sports gaming on behalf of a sports gaming proprietor, including a cashier, change person, count team, or coin wrapper; (c) Providing security for the operation of sports gaming by a sports gaming proprietor, including a guard or observer, other than providing general security at a type C sports gaming host's facility; (d) Performing other duties such that the individual has the ability to alter material aspects of sports gaming conducted by a sports gaming proprietor. (2) An individual is not required to have a sports gaming occupational license if the individual's duties are related solely to nongaming activities such as entertainment, maintenance, or preparing or serving food or beverages, including an individual who is, or is employed by, a type C sports gaming host. (3) The commission shall issue a sports gaming occupational license to an individual who meets the requirements of this chapter and of the commission's rules, provided that the commission's rules shall not require an applicant for a sports gaming occupational license who currently holds a video lottery license issued under Chapter 3770. or a license issued under Chapter 3772. of the Revised Code to take action to satisfy any additional requirement for the sports gaming occupational license that is substantially similar to any requirement the applicant previously has satisfied in order to obtain or renew the applicant's video lottery license or license issued under Chapter 3772. of the Revised Code. (B) A sports gaming occupational license permits the licensee to be employed in the capacity the commission designates during the duration of the license. The commission may establish by rule job classifications with different requirements. (C)(1) An applicant for an initial or renewed sports gaming occupational license shall apply for the license on a form prescribed by the commission and shall pay the fee required under division (C)(3) of section 109.572 of the Revised Code, along with a nonrefundable application fee of one hundred dollars. The commission may annually increase the amount of the application fee in an amount that does not exceed the percentage increase in the consumer price index for the previous year, as necessary to cover the cost of processing the application. As used in this division, "consumer price index" means the consumer price index for all urban consumers or its successive equivalent, as determined by the United States department of labor, bureau of labor statistics, or its successor in responsibility, for all items, Series A. (2) Upon receiving an initial or renewed sports gaming occupational license, the applicant shall pay a nonrefundable license fee of fifty dollars. (3) An applicant's employer may pay the fees described in divisions (C)(1) and (2) of this section on behalf of the applicant. (D) The commission may adopt rules allowing an individual who holds a sports gaming occupational license from another jurisdiction to be licensed in this state by reciprocity, so long as that jurisdiction's requirements to receive that license and the activities authorized by the license are substantially similar to those of this state with respect to the license the individual seeks. (E) A sports gaming occupational license shall be valid for a term of three years. In order to renew a sports gaming occupational license, the licensee shall apply to the commission for a renewed license in the same manner as for an initial license. Sec. 3775.09. (A) An applicant for a sports gaming license, other than a type C sports gaming host license, shall establish the applicant's suitability for the license by clear and convincing evidence. (B) The Ohio casino control commission shall not grant a sports gaming license, other than a type C sports gaming host license, to an applicant if evidence satisfactory to the commission exists that the applicant has done any of the following: (1) Knowingly made a false statement to the commission; (2) Been suspended from operating a gambling game, gaming device, or gaming operation, or had a license revoked by any governmental unit of a national, state, or local body exercising governmental functions; (3) Been convicted of a disqualifying offense, as defined in section 3772.07 of the Revised Code; (4) Been directly involved in or employed by any offshore wagering market that illegally serviced the United States or otherwise accepted illegal wagers from individuals located in the United States on or after April 16, 2015. (C) The commission may deny a sports gaming proprietor, mobile management services provider, or management services provider license to any applicant, reprimand any sports gaming proprietor, mobile management services provider, or management services provider, or suspend or revoke a sports gaming proprietor, mobile management services provider, or management services provider license if any of the following are true: (1) The applicant or licensee has not demonstrated to the commission's satisfaction financial responsibility sufficient to adequately meet the requirements of the enterprise. (2) The applicant or licensee is not the true owner of the business or is not the sole owner and has not disclosed the existence or identity of other persons who have an ownership interest in the business. (3) The applicant or licensee is a corporation that sells more than five per cent of the corporation's voting stock, or more than five per cent of the voting stock of a corporation that controls the corporation, or sells the corporation's assets, other than those bought and sold in the ordinary course of business, or any interest in the assets, to any person who, under division (C) of section 3775.03 of the Revised Code, must meet the qualifications of a sports gaming proprietor, mobile management services provider, or management services provider, as applicable, and who has not already been determined by the commission to have met the applicable qualifications. (D)(1) (D) The commission shall revoke a sports gaming proprietor license that was issued or renewed because of the preference described in division (A) of section 3775.041 of the Revised Code if the sports gaming proprietor ceases to qualify as a professional sports organization, if the casino operator sports gaming proprietor ceases to be a casino operator, or if the video lottery sales agent ceases to be a video lottery sales agent, as applicable. (2) The commission shall revoke a type C sports gaming host license if the licensee ceases to hold a valid class D liquor permit for the facility issued under Chapter 4303. of the Revised Code. (E) The commission shall not grant a sports gaming license to any of the following persons: (1) A nonprofit corporation or organization; (2) An individual who is under twenty-one years of age; (3) An employee of the commission. Sec. 3775.10. (A) A sports gaming proprietor shall do all of the following: (1) Conduct all sports gaming activities and functions in a manner that does not pose a threat to the public health, safety, or welfare of the citizens of this state; (2) Adopt comprehensive house rules for game play governing sports gaming transactions with its patrons, including rules that specify the amounts to be paid on winning wagers and the effect of schedule changes, and submit them to the Ohio casino control commission for approval before implementing them. The sports gaming proprietor shall publish its house rules as part of its minimum internal control standards, shall display the house rules, together with any other information the commission considers appropriate, conspicuously in each sports gaming facility and in any other place or manner prescribed by the commission, and shall make copies of its house rules readily available to patrons. (3) Keep current in all payments and obligations to the commission; (4) Provide a secure location for the placement, operation, and use of sports gaming equipment; (5) Prevent any person from tampering with or interfering with the operation of sports gaming; (6) Employ commercially reasonable methods to prevent the sports gaming proprietor and its agents and employees from disclosing any confidential information in the possession of the sports gaming proprietor that could affect the conduct of sports gaming; (7) Ensure that sports gaming conducted at a sports gaming facility is within the sight and control of designated employees of the sports gaming proprietor and that sports gaming is conducted under continuous observation by security equipment in conformity with the specifications and requirements of the commission; (8) Ensure that sports gaming occurs only in the locations and manner approved by the commission and that the sports gaming proprietor conducts only authorized sports gaming; (9) Ensure that all sports gaming is monitored in accordance with division (I) of section 3775.02 of the Revised Code; (10) Maintain sufficient funds and other supplies to conduct sports gaming at all times; (11) Maintain daily records showing the sports gaming proprietor's sports gaming receipts and timely file with the commission any additional reports required by rule or by other provisions of the Revised Code; (12) Withhold all required amounts from patrons' sports gaming winnings; (13) Submit to the commission, each fiscal year, an audit of the sports gaming proprietor's financial transactions and the condition of the sports gaming proprietor's total operations prepared by a certified public accountant in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles and applicable state and federal laws; (14) Submit to the commission, at least once every three years, an audit of the sports gaming proprietor's information technology systems and security protocols prepared by a qualified, independent, and capable third party, as determined by, and in a manner approved by, the commission; (15) Promptly provide anonymized sports gaming data to a sports governing body or a state university that submits a valid request for the data under division (B)(13) or (14) of section 3775.02 of the Revised Code. (B) A sports gaming proprietor immediately shall report to the commission any information in the sports gaming proprietor's possession related to any of the following: (1) Any wager in violation of this chapter or rules adopted under this chapter or of federal law; (2) Abnormal sports gaming activity or patterns that may indicate a concern regarding the integrity of a sporting event; (3) Suspicious wagering activities; (4) Any conduct that corrupts a wagering outcome of a sporting event for purposes of financial gain; (5) Any criminal or disciplinary proceedings commenced against the sports gaming proprietor by any person other than the commission in connection with the sports gaming proprietor's operations. (C) A sports gaming proprietor may manage risk associated with wagers by rejecting or pooling one or more wagers or by laying off one or more wagers with another sports gaming proprietor. (D) A sports gaming proprietor may employ a system that offsets loss or manages risk in the operation of sports gaming under this chapter through the use of a liquidity pool in another jurisdiction in which the sports gaming proprietor or an affiliate or other third party also holds licensure, provided that at all times adequate protections are maintained to ensure sufficient funds are available to pay patrons. (E) A No sports gaming proprietor may provideshall do any of the following: (1) Provide a promotional gaming credits credit to patrons, subject to oversight by the commissiona patron; (2) Accept payment by credit card for the placing of a wager on a sporting event, for the purchase of credits or other units of exchange that can be used or redeemed to place a wager on a sporting event, or for the purpose of funding a sports gaming account under section 3775.11 of the Revised Code; (3) Accept more than eight wagers on sporting events from any one person within a twenty-four hour period; (4) Accept any one wager of more than one hundred dollars on a sporting event; (5) Offer or accept a proposition bet, parlay, in-game wager, or in-play bet on a sporting event; (6) Offer or accept any bet or wager on a collegiate sport or athletic event. (F) If a sports gaming patron does not claim a winning wager from a sports gaming proprietor within one year from the last day on which the sporting event is held, the sports gaming proprietor's obligation to pay the winnings shall expire, and the sports gaming proprietor shall remit the winnings to the commission, which shall deposit them in the sports gaming revenue fund. (G) A sports gaming proprietor is not liable under the laws of this state to any party, including a patron, for disclosing information as required under this chapter or for refusing to disclose information that is not required by law to be disclosed. (H)(1) A sports gaming proprietor shall maintain the confidentiality of any information provided to the sports gaming proprietor by a sports governing body that the sports governing body designates as confidential, except as otherwise required by law or by order of the commission. The sports gaming proprietor shall not use such confidential information for business or marketing purposes, except with the express written approval of the sports governing body. (2) A sports governing body shall maintain the confidentiality of any information provided to the sports governing body by a sports gaming proprietor that the sports gaming proprietor designates as confidential, except as otherwise required by law or by order of the commission. The sports governing body shall not use such confidential information for business or marketing purposes, except with the express written approval of the sports gaming proprietor. Sec. 3775.12. (A) A type B sports gaming proprietor may accept wagers on sporting events that are made in person only from individuals who are at least twenty-one years of age and who are physically present in a sports gaming facility. A sports gaming proprietor may accept wagers in person or using self-service sports gaming terminals. A sports gaming proprietor also may accept wagers through an application installed on an individual's personal device, so long as the application requires the individual to be physically present in the sports gaming facility in order to place a wager and otherwise meets the requirements of this chapter. (B)(1) Except as otherwise provided in division (B)(2) of this section, before accepting any wager on a sporting event, a type B sports gaming proprietor shall require the individual to register with the sports gaming proprietor, provide the individual's full legal name and any other information required by the Ohio casino control commission or requested by the sports gaming proprietor, and place all wagers on sporting events placed with the sports gaming proprietor through that registration. (2) A type B sports gaming proprietor may accept an anonymous wager from an individual, so long as the amount of the wager does not exceed a dollar limit determined by the commission by rule. (C) Except as provided in divisions (C)(1) and (2) of this section, no individual who is under twenty-one years of age shall enter a sports gaming facility. (1) An employee of a sports gaming proprietor who is eighteen, nineteen, or twenty years of age may be present in a sports gaming facility, so long as the employee's duties are not related to sports gaming. (2) An individual who is under twenty-one years of age may enter a sports gaming facility in order to pass to another area where sports gaming is not being conducted, but only if the individual is personally escorted by an employee of the sports gaming proprietor who remains in close proximity to the individual at all times in accordance with the rules of the commission. Sec. 3775.14. (A) Notwithstanding any contrary provision of section 149.43 of the Revised Code, the Ohio casino control commission shall not disclose to the public any of the following: (1) Any of the following information or documents concerning a person who has applied for or been issued a license under this chapter or the person's spouse, dependent, or employee, unless the person authorizes the commission to disclose the information: (a) A social security number, passport number, or federal tax identification number; (b) A home address, telephone number, or electronic mail address; (c) A birth certificate; (d) A driver's license or state identification card number; (e) The name or address of a previous spouse; (f) A date or place of birth; (g) Any personal financial information or records, including personal tax returns and information and records of criminal proceedings; (h) Any information concerning a minor child; (i) Any information concerning a person the commission has reason to know is a victim of domestic violence, sexual assault, or stalking; (j) Any trade secret, medical records, or patents or exclusive licenses; (k) Security information, including risk prevention plans, detection and countermeasures, location of count rooms or other money storage areas, emergency management plans, security and surveillance plans, equipment and usage protocols, and theft and fraud prevention plans and countermeasures; (l) Any other information that the commission receives from another jurisdiction relating to a person who holds, held, or has applied for a license under this chapter. (2) Any information in a list provided to the commission by a sports governing body under division (F)(2) of section 3775.13 of the Revised Code. (B) Except as otherwise provided in division (A) of this section, all of the following information is subject to disclosure as a public record under section 149.43 of the Revised Code: (1) The information a sports gaming proprietor or an applicant for a sports gaming proprietor, mobile management services provider, or management services provider license has submitted to the commission as part of applying for or renewing a sports gaming proprietor, mobile management services provider, or management services provider license; (2) The name, place of employment, job title, and gaming experience of a person who has applied for or been issued a license under this chapter; (3) The commission's reasons for denying or revoking a license under this chapter or for taking other disciplinary action under this chapter. (C) Division (A) of this section does not prohibit the commission from disclosing information and documents described in that division to the state lottery commission or to the inspector general, a prosecuting authority, a law enforcement agency, or any other appropriate governmental entity or licensing agency, provided that the recipient shall not disclose the information and documents to the public. Sec. 3775.15. (A) All shipments of gambling devices, including any sports gaming equipment, to sports gaming proprietors, mobile management services providers, management services providers, or sports gaming suppliers, or type C sports gaming hosts in this state are legal shipments of gambling devices into this state, as long as the supplier has completed the registering, recording, and labeling of the equipment in accordance with the "Gambling Devices Act of 1962," 15 U.S.C. 1171 to 1178. (B) This state is exempt from section 2 of the "Gambling Devices Act of 1962," 15 U.S.C. 1172. Sec. 3775.16. (A) Pursuant to section 131.02 of the Revised Code, the attorney general shall develop and implement a real time data match program and make it available to each sports gaming proprietor to identify patrons who owe amounts to the state or a political subdivision. (B)(1) Subject to division (E) of this section, before Before disbursing any sports gaming winnings to a patron in an amount for which reporting to the internal revenue service of the amount is required by section 6041 of the Internal Revenue Code, as amended, a sports gaming proprietor shall consult the data match program to determine whether the patron owes any amounts to the state or a political subdivision. If the data match program indicates that the patron owes any amounts to the state or a political subdivision, the sports gaming proprietor shall withhold from the patron's winnings an amount sufficient to satisfy those amounts, up to the amount of the winnings. (2) If the data match program described in section 3123.90 of the Revised Code indicates that the patron also is in default under a support order, the sports gaming proprietor shall transmit to the department of job and family services an amount sufficient to satisfy any past due support owed by the patron, up to the amount of the winnings, before transmitting any remaining amount to the attorney general under division (C) of this section. (C)(1) Not later than fourteen days after withholding an amount under division (B) of this section, the sports gaming proprietor shall transmit to the attorney general any amount withheld and not already disbursed to the department of job and family services under section 3123.90 of the Revised Code as payment on the amount owed. (2) If the patron owes more than one amount to the state or a political subdivision as identified by the data match program described in this section, the amount owed to the state shall be satisfied first, except that any amounts owed under section 5739.33 and division (G) of section 5747.07 of the Revised Code shall have first priority. (D) Except as otherwise provided in section 131.021 of the Revised Code, this section applies only to amounts owed that have become final. (E) A sports gaming proprietor that offers lottery sports gaming through a terminal described in division (B)(3) of section 3770.24 of the Revised Code shall not withhold amounts under this section from winnings from wagers placed through that terminal. The state lottery commission shall withhold amounts from those winnings under section 3770.073 of the Revised Code. (F) The attorney general, in consultation with the commission, may adopt rules under Chapter 119. of the Revised Code as necessary to implement this section. Sec. 3775.99. (A) Whoever knowingly does any of the following commits a misdemeanor of the first degree on the first offense and a felony of the fifth degree on a subsequent offense: (1) Makes a false statement on an application submitted under this chapter; (2) Permits an individual under twenty-one years of age to engage in sports gaming; (3) Aids, induces, or causes an individual under twenty-one years of age who is not an employee of the sports gaming proprietor to enter or attempt to enter a sports gaming facility; (4) Enters or attempts to enter a sports gaming facility while under twenty-one years of age, except as permitted under division (C) of section 3775.12 of the Revised Code; (5) Participates in sports gaming in violation of division (D) of section 3775.13 of the Revised Code, other than as part of operating sports gaming or as part of the employee's employment. (B) Whoever knowingly does any of the following commits a felony of the fifth degree on a first offense and a felony of the fourth degree on a subsequent offense. If the person is a sports gaming licensee under this chapter, the Ohio casino control commission shall revoke the person's license issued under this chapter after the first offense. (1) Offers, promises, or gives anything of value to anyone for the purpose of influencing the outcome of a sporting event or attempts to do so; (2) Places, increases, or decreases a wager after acquiring knowledge not available to the general public that anyone has been offered, promised, or given anything of value for the purpose of influencing the outcome of the sporting event upon which the wager is placed, increased, or decreased, or attempts to do so; (3) Manufactures, sells, or distributes any device that is intended by that person to be used to violate any provision of this chapter or the sports gaming laws of any other state; (4) Places a bet or aids any other person in placing a bet on a sporting event after unlawfully acquiring knowledge of the outcome on which winnings from that bet are contingent; (5) Claims, collects, or takes anything of value from a sports gaming proprietor with intent to defraud or attempts to do so without having made a wager in which the amount or value is legitimately won or owed; (6) Places a wager using counterfeit currency or other counterfeit form of credit approved for wagering; (7) Possesses any device intended to be used to violate this chapter or any rule adopted under this chapter, or any materials used to manufacture such a device. This division does not apply to a sports gaming proprietor or to an agent or employee of a sports gaming proprietor who is acting in furtherance of the sports gaming proprietor's interest. (8) Changes or alters the normal outcome of any sports gaming conducted through an online sports pool, including any system used to monitor the online sports pool, or the way in which the outcome is reported to any patron; (9) Operates sports gaming that is not authorized sports gaming; (9) Otherwise operates sports gaming in a manner other than the manner required under this chapter. Premises or any internet web site used or occupied in violation of this division constitute a nuisance subject to abatement under Chapter 3767. of the Revised Code. (10) Knowingly offers a sports gaming wager to, or accepts such wager from, an individual who is not physically located in a sports gaming facility. (C) Whoever knowingly does any of the following commits a felony of the third degree. If the person is a sports gaming licensee under this chapter, the commission shall revoke the person's license issued under this chapter after the first offense. If the person is a public servant or political party official, the person is forever disqualified from holding any public office, employment, or position of trust in this state. (1) Offers, promises, or gives anything of value or benefit to a person who is connected with a sports gaming proprietor, an agent or employee of a sports gaming proprietor, or a member, agent, or employee of the Ohio casino control commission or the state lottery commission, under an agreement to influence, or with the intent to influence, the actions of the person to whom the offer, promise, or gift is made in order to affect or attempt to affect the outcome of sports gaming or an official action of a member, agent, or employee of the Ohio casino control commission or the state lottery commission; (2) Solicits, accepts, or receives a promise of anything of value or benefit while the person is connected with a sports gaming proprietor, an agent or employee of a sports gaming proprietor, or a member, agent, or employee of the Ohio casino control commission or the state lottery commission, under an agreement to influence, or with the intent to influence, the actions of the person to affect or attempt to affect the outcome of sports gaming or an official action of a member, agent, or employee of the Ohio casino control commission or the state lottery commission. (D) Whoever knowingly does any of the following while participating in sports gaming or otherwise transacting with a sports gaming proprietor as permitted under this chapter or sections 3770.23 to 3770.25 of the Revised Code commits a felony of the fifth degree on a first offense and a felony of the fourth degree on a subsequent offense: (1) Causes or attempts to cause the person to fail to file a report required under 31 U.S.C. 5313(a) or 5325 or any regulation prescribed thereunder or section 1315.53 of the Revised Code, or to fail to file a report or maintain a record required by an order issued under section 21 of the "Federal Deposit Insurance Act" or section 123 of Pub. L. No. 91-508; (2) Causes or attempts to cause the person to file a report under 31 U.S.C. 5313(a) or 5325 or any regulation prescribed thereunder or section 1315.53 of the Revised Code, to file a report or to maintain a record required by any order issued under 31 U.S.C. 3126, or to maintain a record required under any regulation prescribed under section 21 of the "Federal Deposit Insurance Act" or section 123 of Pub. L. No. 91-508 that contains a material omission or misstatement of fact; (3) With one or more sports gaming proprietors, structures a transaction, is complicit in structuring a transaction, attempts to structure a transaction, or is complicit in an attempt to structure a transaction. As used in this division: (a) To be "complicit" means to engage in any conduct of a type described in divisions (A)(1) to (4) of section 2923.03 of the Revised Code. (b) "Structure a transaction" has the same meaning as in section 1315.51 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5747.01. Except as otherwise expressly provided or clearly appearing from the context, any term used in this chapter that is not otherwise defined in this section has the same meaning as when used in a comparable context in the laws of the United States relating to federal income taxes or if not used in a comparable context in those laws, has the same meaning as in section 5733.40 of the Revised Code. Any reference in this chapter to the Internal Revenue Code includes other laws of the United States relating to federal income taxes. As used in this chapter: (A) "Adjusted gross income" or "Ohio adjusted gross income" means federal adjusted gross income, as defined and used in the Internal Revenue Code, adjusted as provided in this section: (1) Add interest or dividends on obligations or securities of any state or of any political subdivision or authority of any state, other than this state and its subdivisions and authorities. (2) Add interest or dividends on obligations of any authority, commission, instrumentality, territory, or possession of the United States to the extent that the interest or dividends are exempt from federal income taxes but not from state income taxes. (3) Deduct interest or dividends on obligations of the United States and its territories and possessions or of any authority, commission, or instrumentality of the United States to the extent that the interest or dividends are included in federal adjusted gross income but exempt from state income taxes under the laws of the United States. (4) Deduct disability and survivor's benefits to the extent included in federal adjusted gross income. (5) Deduct the following, to the extent not otherwise deducted or excluded in computing federal or Ohio adjusted gross income: (a) Benefits under Title II of the Social Security Act and tier 1 railroad retirement; (b) Railroad retirement benefits, other than tier 1 railroad retirement benefits, to the extent such amounts are exempt from state taxation under federal law. (6) Deduct the amount of wages and salaries, if any, not otherwise allowable as a deduction but that would have been allowable as a deduction in computing federal adjusted gross income for the taxable year, had the work opportunity tax credit allowed and determined under sections 38, 51, and 52 of the Internal Revenue Code not been in effect. (7) Deduct any interest or interest equivalent on public obligations and purchase obligations to the extent that the interest or interest equivalent is included in federal adjusted gross income. (8) Add any loss or deduct any gain resulting from the sale, exchange, or other disposition of public obligations to the extent that the loss has been deducted or the gain has been included in computing federal adjusted gross income. (9) Deduct or add amounts, as provided under section 5747.70 of the Revised Code, related to contributions made to or tuition units purchased under a qualified tuition program established pursuant to section 529 of the Internal Revenue Code. (10)(a) Deduct, to the extent not otherwise allowable as a deduction or exclusion in computing federal or Ohio adjusted gross income for the taxable year, the amount the taxpayer paid during the taxable year for medical care insurance and qualified long-term care insurance for the taxpayer, the taxpayer's spouse, and dependents. No deduction for medical care insurance under division (A)(10)(a) of this section shall be allowed either to any taxpayer who is eligible to participate in any subsidized health plan maintained by any employer of the taxpayer or of the taxpayer's spouse, or to any taxpayer who is entitled to, or on application would be entitled to, benefits under part A of Title XVIII of the "Social Security Act," 49 Stat. 620 (1935), 42 U.S.C. 301, as amended. For the purposes of division (A)(10)(a) of this section, "subsidized health plan" means a health plan for which the employer pays any portion of the plan's cost. The deduction allowed under division (A)(10)(a) of this section shall be the net of any related premium refunds, related premium reimbursements, or related insurance premium dividends received during the taxable year. (b) Deduct, to the extent not otherwise deducted or excluded in computing federal or Ohio adjusted gross income during the taxable year, the amount the taxpayer paid during the taxable year, not compensated for by any insurance or otherwise, for medical care of the taxpayer, the taxpayer's spouse, and dependents, to the extent the expenses exceed seven and one-half per cent of the taxpayer's federal adjusted gross income. (c) For purposes of division (A)(10) of this section, "medical care" has the meaning given in section 213 of the Internal Revenue Code, subject to the special rules, limitations, and exclusions set forth therein, and "qualified long-term care" has the same meaning given in section 7702B(c) of the Internal Revenue Code. Solely for purposes of division (A)(10)(a) of this section, "dependent" includes a person who otherwise would be a "qualifying relative" and thus a "dependent" under section 152 of the Internal Revenue Code but for the fact that the person fails to meet the income and support limitations under section 152(d)(1)(B) and (C) of the Internal Revenue Code. (11)(a) Deduct any amount included in federal adjusted gross income solely because the amount represents a reimbursement or refund of expenses that in any year the taxpayer had deducted as an itemized deduction pursuant to section 63 of the Internal Revenue Code and applicable United States department of the treasury regulations. The deduction otherwise allowed under division (A)(11)(a) of this section shall be reduced to the extent the reimbursement is attributable to an amount the taxpayer deducted under this section in any taxable year. (b) Add any amount not otherwise included in Ohio adjusted gross income for any taxable year to the extent that the amount is attributable to the recovery during the taxable year of any amount deducted or excluded in computing federal or Ohio adjusted gross income in any taxable year. (12) Deduct any portion of the deduction described in section 1341(a)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, for repaying previously reported income received under a claim of right, that meets both of the following requirements: (a) It is allowable for repayment of an item that was included in the taxpayer's adjusted gross income for a prior taxable year and did not qualify for a credit under division (A) or (B) of section 5747.05 of the Revised Code for that year; (b) It does not otherwise reduce the taxpayer's adjusted gross income for the current or any other taxable year. (13) Deduct an amount equal to the deposits made to, and net investment earnings of, a medical savings account during the taxable year, in accordance with section 3924.66 of the Revised Code. The deduction allowed by division (A)(13) of this section does not apply to medical savings account deposits and earnings otherwise deducted or excluded for the current or any other taxable year from the taxpayer's federal adjusted gross income. (14)(a) Add an amount equal to the funds withdrawn from a medical savings account during the taxable year, and the net investment earnings on those funds, when the funds withdrawn were used for any purpose other than to reimburse an account holder for, or to pay, eligible medical expenses, in accordance with section 3924.66 of the Revised Code; (b) Add the amounts distributed from a medical savings account under division (A)(2) of section 3924.68 of the Revised Code during the taxable year. (15) Add any amount claimed as a credit under section 5747.059 of the Revised Code to the extent that such amount satisfies either of the following: (a) The amount was deducted or excluded from the computation of the taxpayer's federal adjusted gross income as required to be reported for the taxpayer's taxable year under the Internal Revenue Code; (b) The amount resulted in a reduction of the taxpayer's federal adjusted gross income as required to be reported for any of the taxpayer's taxable years under the Internal Revenue Code. (16) Deduct the amount contributed by the taxpayer to an individual development account program established by a county department of job and family services pursuant to sections 329.11 to 329.14 of the Revised Code for the purpose of matching funds deposited by program participants. On request of the tax commissioner, the taxpayer shall provide any information that, in the tax commissioner's opinion, is necessary to establish the amount deducted under division (A)(16) of this section. (17)(a)(i) Subject to divisions (A)(17)(a)(iii), (iv), and (v) of this section, add five-sixths of the amount of depreciation expense allowed by subsection (k) of section 168 of the Internal Revenue Code, including the taxpayer's proportionate or distributive share of the amount of depreciation expense allowed by that subsection to a pass-through entity in which the taxpayer has a direct or indirect ownership interest. (ii) Subject to divisions (A)(17)(a)(iii), (iv), and (v) of this section, add five-sixths of the amount of qualifying section 179 depreciation expense, including the taxpayer's proportionate or distributive share of the amount of qualifying section 179 depreciation expense allowed to any pass-through entity in which the taxpayer has a direct or indirect ownership interest. (iii) Subject to division (A)(17)(a)(v) of this section, for taxable years beginning in 2012 or thereafter, if the increase in income taxes withheld by the taxpayer is equal to or greater than ten per cent of income taxes withheld by the taxpayer during the taxpayer's immediately preceding taxable year, "two-thirds" shall be substituted for "five-sixths" for the purpose of divisions (A)(17)(a)(i) and (ii) of this section. (iv) Subject to division (A)(17)(a)(v) of this section, for taxable years beginning in 2012 or thereafter, a taxpayer is not required to add an amount under division (A)(17) of this section if the increase in income taxes withheld by the taxpayer and by any pass-through entity in which the taxpayer has a direct or indirect ownership interest is equal to or greater than the sum of (I) the amount of qualifying section 179 depreciation expense and (II) the amount of depreciation expense allowed to the taxpayer by subsection (k) of section 168 of the Internal Revenue Code, and including the taxpayer's proportionate or distributive shares of such amounts allowed to any such pass-through entities. (v) If a taxpayer directly or indirectly incurs a net operating loss for the taxable year for federal income tax purposes, to the extent such loss resulted from depreciation expense allowed by subsection (k) of section 168 of the Internal Revenue Code and by qualifying section 179 depreciation expense, "the entire" shall be substituted for "five-sixths of the" for the purpose of divisions (A)(17)(a)(i) and (ii) of this section. The tax commissioner, under procedures established by the commissioner, may waive the add-backs related to a pass-through entity if the taxpayer owns, directly or indirectly, less than five per cent of the pass-through entity. (b) Nothing in division (A)(17) of this section shall be construed to adjust or modify the adjusted basis of any asset. (c) To the extent the add-back required under division (A)(17)(a) of this section is attributable to property generating nonbusiness income or loss allocated under section 5747.20 of the Revised Code, the add-back shall be sitused to the same location as the nonbusiness income or loss generated by the property for the purpose of determining the credit under division (A) of section 5747.05 of the Revised Code. Otherwise, the add-back shall be apportioned, subject to one or more of the four alternative methods of apportionment enumerated in section 5747.21 of the Revised Code. (d) For the purposes of division (A)(17)(a)(v) of this section, net operating loss carryback and carryforward shall not include the allowance of any net operating loss deduction carryback or carryforward to the taxable year to the extent such loss resulted from depreciation allowed by section 168(k) of the Internal Revenue Code and by the qualifying section 179 depreciation expense amount. (e) For the purposes of divisions (A)(17) and (18) of this section: (i) "Income taxes withheld" means the total amount withheld and remitted under sections 5747.06 and 5747.07 of the Revised Code by an employer during the employer's taxable year. (ii) "Increase in income taxes withheld" means the amount by which the amount of income taxes withheld by an employer during the employer's current taxable year exceeds the amount of income taxes withheld by that employer during the employer's immediately preceding taxable year. (iii) "Qualifying section 179 depreciation expense" means the difference between (I) the amount of depreciation expense directly or indirectly allowed to a taxpayer under section 179 of the Internal Revised Code, and (II) the amount of depreciation expense directly or indirectly allowed to the taxpayer under section 179 of the Internal Revenue Code as that section existed on December 31, 2002. (18)(a) If the taxpayer was required to add an amount under division (A)(17)(a) of this section for a taxable year, deduct one of the following: (i) One-fifth of the amount so added for each of the five succeeding taxable years if the amount so added was five-sixths of qualifying section 179 depreciation expense or depreciation expense allowed by subsection (k) of section 168 of the Internal Revenue Code; (ii) One-half of the amount so added for each of the two succeeding taxable years if the amount so added was two-thirds of such depreciation expense; (iii) One-sixth of the amount so added for each of the six succeeding taxable years if the entire amount of such depreciation expense was so added. (b) If the amount deducted under division (A)(18)(a) of this section is attributable to an add-back allocated under division (A)(17)(c) of this section, the amount deducted shall be sitused to the same location. Otherwise, the deduction shall be apportioned using the apportionment factors for the taxable year in which the deduction is taken, subject to one or more of the four alternative methods of apportionment enumerated in section 5747.21 of the Revised Code. (c) No deduction is available under division (A)(18)(a) of this section with regard to any depreciation allowed by section 168(k) of the Internal Revenue Code and by the qualifying section 179 depreciation expense amount to the extent that such depreciation results in or increases a federal net operating loss carryback or carryforward. If no such deduction is available for a taxable year, the taxpayer may carry forward the amount not deducted in such taxable year to the next taxable year and add that amount to any deduction otherwise available under division (A)(18)(a) of this section for that next taxable year. The carryforward of amounts not so deducted shall continue until the entire addition required by division (A)(17)(a) of this section has been deducted. (19) Deduct, to the extent not otherwise deducted or excluded in computing federal or Ohio adjusted gross income for the taxable year, the amount the taxpayer received during the taxable year as reimbursement for life insurance premiums under section 5919.31 of the Revised Code. (20) Deduct, to the extent not otherwise deducted or excluded in computing federal or Ohio adjusted gross income for the taxable year, the amount the taxpayer received during the taxable year as a death benefit paid by the adjutant general under section 5919.33 of the Revised Code. (21) Deduct, to the extent included in federal adjusted gross income and not otherwise allowable as a deduction or exclusion in computing federal or Ohio adjusted gross income for the taxable year, military pay and allowances received by the taxpayer during the taxable year for active duty service in the armed forces of the United States, as defined in section 5907.01 of the Revised Code, or reserve components thereof or the national guard. The deduction may not be claimed for military pay and allowances received by the taxpayer while the taxpayer is stationed in this state. (22) Deduct, to the extent not otherwise allowable as a deduction or exclusion in computing federal or Ohio adjusted gross income for the taxable year and not otherwise compensated for by any other source, the amount of qualified organ donation expenses incurred by the taxpayer during the taxable year, not to exceed ten thousand dollars. A taxpayer may deduct qualified organ donation expenses only once for all taxable years beginning with taxable years beginning in 2007. For the purposes of division (A)(22) of this section: (a) "Human organ" means all or any portion of a human liver, pancreas, kidney, intestine, or lung, and any portion of human bone marrow. (b) "Qualified organ donation expenses" means travel expenses, lodging expenses, and wages and salary forgone by a taxpayer in connection with the taxpayer's donation, while living, of one or more of the taxpayer's human organs to another human being. (23) Deduct, to the extent not otherwise deducted or excluded in computing federal or Ohio adjusted gross income for the taxable year, amounts received by the taxpayer as retired personnel pay for service in the uniformed services or reserve components thereof, or the national guard, or received by the surviving spouse or former spouse of such a taxpayer under the survivor benefit plan on account of such a taxpayer's death. If the taxpayer receives income on account of retirement paid under the federal civil service retirement system or federal employees retirement system, or under any successor retirement program enacted by the congress of the United States that is established and maintained for retired employees of the United States government, and such retirement income is based, in whole or in part, on credit for the taxpayer's uniformed service, the deduction allowed under this division shall include only that portion of such retirement income that is attributable to the taxpayer's uniformed service, to the extent that portion of such retirement income is otherwise included in federal adjusted gross income and is not otherwise deducted under this section. Any amount deducted under division (A)(23) of this section is not included in a taxpayer's adjusted gross income for the purposes of section 5747.055 of the Revised Code. No amount may be deducted under division (A)(23) of this section on the basis of which a credit was claimed under section 5747.055 of the Revised Code. (24) Deduct, to the extent not otherwise deducted or excluded in computing federal or Ohio adjusted gross income for the taxable year, the amount the taxpayer received during the taxable year from the military injury relief fund created in section 5902.05 of the Revised Code. (25) Deduct, to the extent not otherwise deducted or excluded in computing federal or Ohio adjusted gross income for the taxable year, the amount the taxpayer received as a veterans bonus during the taxable year from the Ohio department of veterans services as authorized by Section 2r of Article VIII, Ohio Constitution. (26) Deduct, to the extent not otherwise deducted or excluded in computing federal or Ohio adjusted gross income for the taxable year, any income derived from a transfer agreement or from the enterprise transferred under that agreement under section 4313.02 of the Revised Code. (27) Deduct, to the extent not otherwise deducted or excluded in computing federal or Ohio adjusted gross income for the taxable year, Ohio college opportunity or federal Pell grant amounts received by the taxpayer or the taxpayer's spouse or dependent pursuant to section 3333.122 of the Revised Code or 20 U.S.C. 1070a, et seq., and used to pay room or board furnished by the educational institution for which the grant was awarded at the institution's facilities, including meal plans administered by the institution. For the purposes of this division, receipt of a grant includes the distribution of a grant directly to an educational institution and the crediting of the grant to the enrollee's account with the institution. (28) Deduct from the portion of an individual's federal adjusted gross income that is business income, to the extent not otherwise deducted or excluded in computing federal adjusted gross income for the taxable year, one hundred twenty-five thousand dollars for each spouse if spouses file separate returns under section 5747.08 of the Revised Code or two hundred fifty thousand dollars for all other individuals. (29) Deduct, as provided under section 5747.78 of the Revised Code, contributions to ABLE savings accounts made in accordance with sections 113.50 to 113.56 of the Revised Code. (30)(a) Deduct, to the extent not otherwise deducted or excluded in computing federal or Ohio adjusted gross income during the taxable year, all of the following: (i) Compensation paid to a qualifying employee described in division (A)(14)(a) of section 5703.94 of the Revised Code to the extent such compensation is for disaster work conducted in this state during a disaster response period pursuant to a qualifying solicitation received by the employee's employer; (ii) Compensation paid to a qualifying employee described in division (A)(14)(b) of section 5703.94 of the Revised Code to the extent such compensation is for disaster work conducted in this state by the employee during the disaster response period on critical infrastructure owned or used by the employee's employer; (iii) Income received by an out-of-state disaster business for disaster work conducted in this state during a disaster response period, or, if the out-of-state disaster business is a pass-through entity, a taxpayer's distributive share of the pass-through entity's income from the business conducting disaster work in this state during a disaster response period, if, in either case, the disaster work is conducted pursuant to a qualifying solicitation received by the business. (b) All terms used in division (A)(30) of this section have the same meanings as in section 5703.94 of the Revised Code. (31) For a taxpayer who is a qualifying Ohio educator, deduct, to the extent not otherwise deducted or excluded in computing federal or Ohio adjusted gross income for the taxable year, the lesser of three hundred dollars or the amount of expenses described in subsections (a)(2)(D)(i) and (ii) of section 62 of the Internal Revenue Code paid or incurred by the taxpayer during the taxpayer's taxable year in excess of the amount the taxpayer is authorized to deduct for that taxable year under subsection (a)(2)(D) of that section. (32) Deduct, to the extent not otherwise deducted or excluded in computing federal or Ohio adjusted gross income for the taxable year, amounts received by the taxpayer as a disability severance payment, computed under 10 U.S.C. 1212, following discharge or release under honorable conditions from the armed forces of the United States, as defined in section 5907.01 of the Revised Code. (33) Deduct, to the extent not otherwise deducted or excluded in computing federal adjusted gross income or Ohio adjusted gross income, amounts not subject to tax due to an agreement entered into under division (A)(2) of section 5747.05 of the Revised Code. (34) Deduct amounts as provided under section 5747.79 of the Revised Code related to the taxpayer's qualifying capital gains and deductible payroll. To the extent a qualifying capital gain described under division (A)(34) of this section is business income, the taxpayer shall deduct those gains under this division before deducting any such gains under division (A)(28) of this section. (35)(a) For taxable years beginning in or after 2026, deduct, to the extent not otherwise deducted or excluded in computing federal or Ohio adjusted gross income for the taxable year: (i) One hundred per cent of the capital gain received by the taxpayer in the taxable year from a qualifying interest in an Ohio venture capital operating company attributable to the company's investments in Ohio businesses during the period for which the company was an Ohio venture operating company; and (ii) Fifty per cent of the capital gain received by the taxpayer in the taxable year from a qualifying interest in an Ohio venture capital operating company attributable to the company's investments in all other businesses during the period for which the company was an Ohio venture operating company. (b) Add amounts previously deducted by the taxpayer under division (A)(35)(a) of this section if the director of development certifies to the tax commissioner that the requirements for the deduction were not met. (c) All terms used in division (A)(35) of this section have the same meanings as in section 122.851 of the Revised Code. (d) To the extent a capital gain described in division (A)(35)(a) of this section is business income, the taxpayer shall apply that division before applying division (A)(28) of this section. (36) Add, to the extent not otherwise included in computing federal or Ohio adjusted gross income for any taxable year, the taxpayer's proportionate share of the amount of the tax levied under section 5747.38 of the Revised Code and paid by an electing pass-through entity for the taxable year. Notwithstanding any provision of the Revised Code to the contrary, the portion of the addition required by division (A)(36) of this section related to the apportioned business income of the pass-through entity shall be considered business income under division (B) of this section. Such addition is eligible for the deduction in division (A)(28) of this section, subject to the applicable dollar limitations, and the tax rate prescribed by division (A)(4)(a) of section 5747.02 of the Revised Code. The taxpayer shall provide, upon request of the tax commissioner, any documentation necessary to verify the portion of the addition that is business income under this division. (37) Deduct, to the extent not otherwise deducted or excluded in computing federal or Ohio adjusted gross income for the taxable year, amounts delivered to a qualifying institution pursuant to section 3333.128 of the Revised Code for the benefit of the taxpayer or the taxpayer's spouse or dependent. (38) Deduct, to the extent not otherwise deducted or excluded in computing federal or Ohio adjusted gross income for the taxable year, amounts received under the Ohio adoption grant program pursuant to section 5180.451 of the Revised Code. (39) Deduct, to the extent included in federal adjusted gross income, income attributable to amounts provided to a taxpayer for any of the purposes for which an exclusion would have been authorized under section 139 of the Internal Revenue Code if the train derailment near the city of East Palestine on February 3, 2023, had been a qualified disaster pursuant to that section, or to compensate for lost business resulting from that derailment, if such amounts are provided by any of the following: (a) A federal, state, or local government agency; (b) A railroad company, as that term is defined in section 5727.01 of the Revised Code; (c) Any subsidiary, insurer, or agent of a railroad company or any related person. Notwithstanding any provision to the contrary, the derailment is not required to meet the definition of a "qualified disaster" pursuant to section 139 of the Internal Revenue Code to qualify for the deduction under this section. (40) Deduct, to the extent included in federal adjusted gross income, income attributable to loan repayments on behalf of the taxpayer under the rural practice incentive program under section 3333.135 of the Revised Code. (41) Add any income taxes deducted in computing federal or Ohio adjusted gross income to the extent the income taxes were derived from income subject to a tax levied in another state or the District of Columbia when such tax was enacted for purposes of complying with internal revenue service notice 2020-75. Notwithstanding any provision of the Revised Code to the contrary, the portion of the addition required by division (A)(41) of this section related to the apportioned business income of the pass-through entity shall be considered business income under division (B) of this section. Such addition is eligible for the deduction in division (A)(28) of this section, subject to the applicable dollar limitations, and the tax rate prescribed by division (A)(4)(a) of section 5747.02 of the Revised Code. The taxpayer shall provide, upon request of the tax commissioner, any documentation necessary to verify the portion of the addition that is business income under this division. (42) Deduct amounts contributed to a homeownership savings account and calculated pursuant to divisions (B) and (C) of section 5747.85 of the Revised Code. (43) If the taxpayer is the account owner of a homeownership savings account, upon withdrawal or transfer of funds from the account, or closure of the account containing funds that are not used for eligible expenses, add the amount of such funds not used for an eligible expense. The addition required under this division shall not exceed the sum of the amounts deducted by the taxpayer for such account under division (A)(42) of this section in any taxable year and the amount of any funds deposited in the account by a contributor other than the account owner. As used in division (A)(43) of this section, "homeownership savings account," "contributor," "account owner," and "eligible expenses" have the same meanings as in section 5747.85 of the Revised Code. (44) Deduct, to the extent not otherwise deducted or excluded in computing federal or Ohio adjusted gross income during the taxable year, up to seven hundred fifty dollars of contributions the taxpayer makes to a pregnancy resource center that meets the criteria in division (B) of section 5180.71 of the Revised Code. (B) "Business income" means income, including gain or loss, arising from transactions, activities, and sources in the regular course of a trade or business and includes income, gain, or loss from real property, tangible property, and intangible property if the acquisition, rental, management, and disposition of the property constitute integral parts of the regular course of a trade or business operation. "Business income" includes income, including gain or loss, from a partial or complete liquidation of a business, including, but not limited to, gain or loss from the sale or other disposition of goodwill or the sale of an equity or ownership interest in a business. As used in this division, the "sale of an equity or ownership interest in a business" means sales to which either or both of the following apply: (1) The sale is treated for federal income tax purposes as the sale of assets. (2) The seller materially participated, as described in 26 C.F.R. 1.469-5T, in the activities of the business during the taxable year in which the sale occurs or during any of the five preceding taxable years. (C) "Nonbusiness income" means all income other than business income and may include, but is not limited to, compensation, rents and royalties from real or tangible personal property, capital gains, interest, dividends and distributions, patent or copyright royalties, or lottery winnings, prizes, and awards. (D) "Compensation" means any form of remuneration paid to an employee for personal services. (E) "Fiduciary" means a guardian, trustee, executor, administrator, receiver, conservator, or any other person acting in any fiduciary capacity for any individual, trust, or estate. (F) "Fiscal year" means an accounting period of twelve months ending on the last day of any month other than December. (G) "Individual" means any natural person. (H) "Internal Revenue Code" means the "Internal Revenue Code of 1986," 100 Stat. 2085, 26 U.S.C.A. 1, as amended. (I) "Resident" means any of the following: (1) An individual who is domiciled in this state, subject to section 5747.24 of the Revised Code; (2) The estate of a decedent who at the time of death was domiciled in this state. The domicile tests of section 5747.24 of the Revised Code are not controlling for purposes of division (I)(2) of this section. (3) A trust that, in whole or part, resides in this state. If only part of a trust resides in this state, the trust is a resident only with respect to that part. For the purposes of division (I)(3) of this section: (a) A trust resides in this state for the trust's current taxable year to the extent, as described in division (I)(3)(d) of this section, that the trust consists directly or indirectly, in whole or in part, of assets, net of any related liabilities, that were transferred, or caused to be transferred, directly or indirectly, to the trust by any of the following: (i) A person, a court, or a governmental entity or instrumentality on account of the death of a decedent, but only if the trust is described in division (I)(3)(e)(i) or (ii) of this section; (ii) A person who was domiciled in this state for the purposes of this chapter when the person directly or indirectly transferred assets to an irrevocable trust, but only if at least one of the trust's qualifying beneficiaries is domiciled in this state for the purposes of this chapter during all or some portion of the trust's current taxable year; (iii) A person who was domiciled in this state for the purposes of this chapter when the trust document or instrument or part of the trust document or instrument became irrevocable, but only if at least one of the trust's qualifying beneficiaries is a resident domiciled in this state for the purposes of this chapter during all or some portion of the trust's current taxable year. If a trust document or instrument became irrevocable upon the death of a person who at the time of death was domiciled in this state for purposes of this chapter, that person is a person described in division (I)(3)(a)(iii) of this section. (b) A trust is irrevocable to the extent that the transferor is not considered to be the owner of the net assets of the trust under sections 671 to 678 of the Internal Revenue Code. (c) With respect to a trust other than a charitable lead trust, "qualifying beneficiary" has the same meaning as "potential current beneficiary" as defined in section 1361(e)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, and with respect to a charitable lead trust "qualifying beneficiary" is any current, future, or contingent beneficiary, but with respect to any trust "qualifying beneficiary" excludes a person or a governmental entity or instrumentality to any of which a contribution would qualify for the charitable deduction under section 170 of the Internal Revenue Code. (d) For the purposes of division (I)(3)(a) of this section, the extent to which a trust consists directly or indirectly, in whole or in part, of assets, net of any related liabilities, that were transferred directly or indirectly, in whole or part, to the trust by any of the sources enumerated in that division shall be ascertained by multiplying the fair market value of the trust's assets, net of related liabilities, by the qualifying ratio, which shall be computed as follows: (i) The first time the trust receives assets, the numerator of the qualifying ratio is the fair market value of those assets at that time, net of any related liabilities, from sources enumerated in division (I)(3)(a) of this section. The denominator of the qualifying ratio is the fair market value of all the trust's assets at that time, net of any related liabilities. (ii) Each subsequent time the trust receives assets, a revised qualifying ratio shall be computed. The numerator of the revised qualifying ratio is the sum of (1) the fair market value of the trust's assets immediately prior to the subsequent transfer, net of any related liabilities, multiplied by the qualifying ratio last computed without regard to the subsequent transfer, and (2) the fair market value of the subsequently transferred assets at the time transferred, net of any related liabilities, from sources enumerated in division (I)(3)(a) of this section. The denominator of the revised qualifying ratio is the fair market value of all the trust's assets immediately after the subsequent transfer, net of any related liabilities. (iii) Whether a transfer to the trust is by or from any of the sources enumerated in division (I)(3)(a) of this section shall be ascertained without regard to the domicile of the trust's beneficiaries. (e) For the purposes of division (I)(3)(a)(i) of this section: (i) A trust is described in division (I)(3)(e)(i) of this section if the trust is a testamentary trust and the testator of that testamentary trust was domiciled in this state at the time of the testator's death for purposes of the taxes levied under Chapter 5731. of the Revised Code. (ii) A trust is described in division (I)(3)(e)(ii) of this section if the transfer is a qualifying transfer described in any of divisions (I)(3)(f)(i) to (vi) of this section, the trust is an irrevocable inter vivos trust, and at least one of the trust's qualifying beneficiaries is domiciled in this state for purposes of this chapter during all or some portion of the trust's current taxable year. (f) For the purposes of division (I)(3)(e)(ii) of this section, a "qualifying transfer" is a transfer of assets, net of any related liabilities, directly or indirectly to a trust, if the transfer is described in any of the following: (i) The transfer is made to a trust, created by the decedent before the decedent's death and while the decedent was domiciled in this state for the purposes of this chapter, and, prior to the death of the decedent, the trust became irrevocable while the decedent was domiciled in this state for the purposes of this chapter. (ii) The transfer is made to a trust to which the decedent, prior to the decedent's death, had directly or indirectly transferred assets, net of any related liabilities, while the decedent was domiciled in this state for the purposes of this chapter, and prior to the death of the decedent the trust became irrevocable while the decedent was domiciled in this state for the purposes of this chapter. (iii) The transfer is made on account of a contractual relationship existing directly or indirectly between the transferor and either the decedent or the estate of the decedent at any time prior to the date of the decedent's death, and the decedent was domiciled in this state at the time of death for purposes of the taxes levied under Chapter 5731. of the Revised Code. (iv) The transfer is made to a trust on account of a contractual relationship existing directly or indirectly between the transferor and another person who at the time of the decedent's death was domiciled in this state for purposes of this chapter. (v) The transfer is made to a trust on account of the will of a testator who was domiciled in this state at the time of the testator's death for purposes of the taxes levied under Chapter 5731. of the Revised Code. (vi) The transfer is made to a trust created by or caused to be created by a court, and the trust was directly or indirectly created in connection with or as a result of the death of an individual who, for purposes of the taxes levied under Chapter 5731. of the Revised Code, was domiciled in this state at the time of the individual's death. (g) The tax commissioner may adopt rules to ascertain the part of a trust residing in this state. (J) "Nonresident" means an individual or estate that is not a resident. An individual who is a resident for only part of a taxable year is a nonresident for the remainder of that taxable year. (K) "Pass-through entity" has the same meaning as in section 5733.04 of the Revised Code. (L) "Return" means the notifications and reports required to be filed pursuant to this chapter for the purpose of reporting the tax due and includes declarations of estimated tax when so required. (M) "Taxable year" means the calendar year or the taxpayer's fiscal year ending during the calendar year, or fractional part thereof, upon which the adjusted gross income is calculated pursuant to this chapter. (N) "Taxpayer" means any person subject to the tax imposed by section 5747.02 of the Revised Code or any pass-through entity that makes the election under division (D) of section 5747.08 of the Revised Code. (O) "Dependents" means dependents as defined in the Internal Revenue Code. (P) "Principal county of employment" means, in the case of a nonresident, the county within the state in which a taxpayer performs services for an employer or, if those services are performed in more than one county, the county in which the major portion of the services are performed. (Q) As used in sections 5747.50 to 5747.55 of the Revised Code: (1) "Subdivision" means any county, municipal corporation, park district, or township. (2) "Essential local government purposes" includes all functions that any subdivision is required by general law to exercise, including like functions that are exercised under a charter adopted pursuant to the Ohio Constitution. (R) "Overpayment" means any amount already paid that exceeds the figure determined to be the correct amount of the tax. (S) "Taxable income" or "Ohio taxable income" applies only to estates and trusts, and means federal taxable income, as defined and used in the Internal Revenue Code, adjusted as follows: (1) Add interest or dividends, net of ordinary, necessary, and reasonable expenses not deducted in computing federal taxable income, on obligations or securities of any state or of any political subdivision or authority of any state, other than this state and its subdivisions and authorities, but only to the extent that such net amount is not otherwise includible in Ohio taxable income and is described in either division (S)(1)(a) or (b) of this section: (a) The net amount is not attributable to the S portion of an electing small business trust and has not been distributed to beneficiaries for the taxable year; (b) The net amount is attributable to the S portion of an electing small business trust for the taxable year. (2) Add interest or dividends, net of ordinary, necessary, and reasonable expenses not deducted in computing federal taxable income, on obligations of any authority, commission, instrumentality, territory, or possession of the United States to the extent that the interest or dividends are exempt from federal income taxes but not from state income taxes, but only to the extent that such net amount is not otherwise includible in Ohio taxable income and is described in either division (S)(1)(a) or (b) of this section; (3) Add the amount of personal exemption allowed to the estate pursuant to section 642(b) of the Internal Revenue Code; (4) Deduct interest or dividends, net of related expenses deducted in computing federal taxable income, on obligations of the United States and its territories and possessions or of any authority, commission, or instrumentality of the United States to the extent that the interest or dividends are exempt from state taxes under the laws of the United States, but only to the extent that such amount is included in federal taxable income and is described in either division (S)(1)(a) or (b) of this section; (5) Deduct the amount of wages and salaries, if any, not otherwise allowable as a deduction but that would have been allowable as a deduction in computing federal taxable income for the taxable year, had the work opportunity tax credit allowed under sections 38, 51, and 52 of the Internal Revenue Code not been in effect, but only to the extent such amount relates either to income included in federal taxable income for the taxable year or to income of the S portion of an electing small business trust for the taxable year; (6) Deduct any interest or interest equivalent, net of related expenses deducted in computing federal taxable income, on public obligations and purchase obligations, but only to the extent that such net amount relates either to income included in federal taxable income for the taxable year or to income of the S portion of an electing small business trust for the taxable year; (7) Add any loss or deduct any gain resulting from sale, exchange, or other disposition of public obligations to the extent that such loss has been deducted or such gain has been included in computing either federal taxable income or income of the S portion of an electing small business trust for the taxable year; (8) Except in the case of the final return of an estate, add any amount deducted by the taxpayer on both its Ohio estate tax return pursuant to section 5731.14 of the Revised Code, and on its federal income tax return in determining federal taxable income; (9)(a) Deduct any amount included in federal taxable income solely because the amount represents a reimbursement or refund of expenses that in a previous year the decedent had deducted as an itemized deduction pursuant to section 63 of the Internal Revenue Code and applicable treasury regulations. The deduction otherwise allowed under division (S)(9)(a) of this section shall be reduced to the extent the reimbursement is attributable to an amount the taxpayer or decedent deducted under this section in any taxable year. (b) Add any amount not otherwise included in Ohio taxable income for any taxable year to the extent that the amount is attributable to the recovery during the taxable year of any amount deducted or excluded in computing federal or Ohio taxable income in any taxable year, but only to the extent such amount has not been distributed to beneficiaries for the taxable year. (10) Deduct any portion of the deduction described in section 1341(a)(2) of the Internal Revenue Code, for repaying previously reported income received under a claim of right, that meets both of the following requirements: (a) It is allowable for repayment of an item that was included in the taxpayer's taxable income or the decedent's adjusted gross income for a prior taxable year and did not qualify for a credit under division (A) or (B) of section 5747.05 of the Revised Code for that year. (b) It does not otherwise reduce the taxpayer's taxable income or the decedent's adjusted gross income for the current or any other taxable year. (11) Add any amount claimed as a credit under section 5747.059 of the Revised Code to the extent that the amount satisfies either of the following: (a) The amount was deducted or excluded from the computation of the taxpayer's federal taxable income as required to be reported for the taxpayer's taxable year under the Internal Revenue Code; (b) The amount resulted in a reduction in the taxpayer's federal taxable income as required to be reported for any of the taxpayer's taxable years under the Internal Revenue Code. (12) Deduct any amount, net of related expenses deducted in computing federal taxable income, that a trust is required to report as farm income on its federal income tax return, but only if the assets of the trust include at least ten acres of land satisfying the definition of "land devoted exclusively to agricultural use" under section 5713.30 of the Revised Code, regardless of whether the land is valued for tax purposes as such land under sections 5713.30 to 5713.38 of the Revised Code. If the trust is a pass-through entity investor, section 5747.231 of the Revised Code applies in ascertaining if the trust is eligible to claim the deduction provided by division (S)(12) of this section in connection with the pass-through entity's farm income. Except for farm income attributable to the S portion of an electing small business trust, the deduction provided by division (S)(12) of this section is allowed only to the extent that the trust has not distributed such farm income. (13) Add the net amount of income described in section 641(c) of the Internal Revenue Code to the extent that amount is not included in federal taxable income. (14) Add or deduct the amount the taxpayer would be required to add or deduct under division (A)(17) or (18) of this section if the taxpayer's Ohio taxable income was computed in the same manner as an individual's Ohio adjusted gross income is computed under this section. (15) Add, to the extent not otherwise included in computing taxable income or Ohio taxable income for any taxable year, the taxpayer's proportionate share of the amount of the tax levied under section 5747.38 of the Revised Code and paid by an electing pass-through entity for the taxable year. (16) Add any income taxes deducted in computing federal taxable income or Ohio taxable income to the extent the income taxes were derived from income subject to a tax levied in another state or the District of Columbia when such tax was enacted for purposes of complying with internal revenue service notice 2020-75. (T) "School district income" and "school district income tax" have the same meanings as in section 5748.01 of the Revised Code. (U) As used in divisions (A)(7), (A)(8), (S)(6), and (S)(7) of this section, "public obligations," "purchase obligations," and "interest or interest equivalent" have the same meanings as in section 5709.76 of the Revised Code. (V) "Limited liability company" means any limited liability company formed under former Chapter 1705. of the Revised Code as that chapter existed prior to February 11, 2022, Chapter 1706. of the Revised Code, or the laws of any other state. (W) "Pass-through entity investor" means any person who, during any portion of a taxable year of a pass-through entity, is a partner, member, shareholder, or equity investor in that pass-through entity. (X) "Banking day" has the same meaning as in section 1304.01 of the Revised Code. (Y) "Month" means a calendar month. (Z) "Quarter" means the first three months, the second three months, the third three months, or the last three months of the taxpayer's taxable year. (AA)(1) "Modified business income" means the business income included in a trust's Ohio taxable income after such taxable income is first reduced by the qualifying trust amount, if any. (2) "Qualifying trust amount" of a trust means capital gains and losses from the sale, exchange, or other disposition of equity or ownership interests in, or debt obligations of, a qualifying investee to the extent included in the trust's Ohio taxable income, but only if the following requirements are satisfied: (a) The book value of the qualifying investee's physical assets in this state and everywhere, as of the last day of the qualifying investee's fiscal or calendar year ending immediately prior to the date on which the trust recognizes the gain or loss, is available to the trust. (b) The requirements of section 5747.011 of the Revised Code are satisfied for the trust's taxable year in which the trust recognizes the gain or loss. Any gain or loss that is not a qualifying trust amount is modified business income, qualifying investment income, or modified nonbusiness income, as the case may be. (3) "Modified nonbusiness income" means a trust's Ohio taxable income other than modified business income, other than the qualifying trust amount, and other than qualifying investment income, as defined in section 5747.012 of the Revised Code, to the extent such qualifying investment income is not otherwise part of modified business income. (4) "Modified Ohio taxable income" applies only to trusts, and means the sum of the amounts described in divisions (AA)(4)(a) to (c) of this section: (a) The fraction, calculated under section 5747.013, and applying section 5747.231 of the Revised Code, multiplied by the sum of the following amounts: (i) The trust's modified business income; (ii) The trust's qualifying investment income, as defined in section 5747.012 of the Revised Code, but only to the extent the qualifying investment income does not otherwise constitute modified business income and does not otherwise constitute a qualifying trust amount. (b) The qualifying trust amount multiplied by a fraction, the numerator of which is the sum of the book value of the qualifying investee's physical assets in this state on the last day of the qualifying investee's fiscal or calendar year ending immediately prior to the day on which the trust recognizes the qualifying trust amount, and the denominator of which is the sum of the book value of the qualifying investee's total physical assets everywhere on the last day of the qualifying investee's fiscal or calendar year ending immediately prior to the day on which the trust recognizes the qualifying trust amount. If, for a taxable year, the trust recognizes a qualifying trust amount with respect to more than one qualifying investee, the amount described in division (AA)(4)(b) of this section shall equal the sum of the products so computed for each such qualifying investee. (c)(i) With respect to a trust or portion of a trust that is a resident as ascertained in accordance with division (I)(3)(d) of this section, its modified nonbusiness income. (ii) With respect to a trust or portion of a trust that is not a resident as ascertained in accordance with division (I)(3)(d) of this section, the amount of its modified nonbusiness income satisfying the descriptions in divisions (B)(2) to (5) of section 5747.20 of the Revised Code, except as otherwise provided in division (AA)(4)(c)(ii) of this section. With respect to a trust or portion of a trust that is not a resident as ascertained in accordance with division (I)(3)(d) of this section, the trust's portion of modified nonbusiness income recognized from the sale, exchange, or other disposition of a debt interest in or equity interest in a section 5747.212 entity, as defined in section 5747.212 of the Revised Code, without regard to division (A) of that section, shall not be allocated to this state in accordance with section 5747.20 of the Revised Code but shall be apportioned to this state in accordance with division (B) of section 5747.212 of the Revised Code without regard to division (A) of that section. If the allocation and apportionment of a trust's income under divisions (AA)(4)(a) and (c) of this section do not fairly represent the modified Ohio taxable income of the trust in this state, the alternative methods described in division (C) of section 5747.21 of the Revised Code may be applied in the manner and to the same extent provided in that section. (5)(a) Except as set forth in division (AA)(5)(b) of this section, "qualifying investee" means a person in which a trust has an equity or ownership interest, or a person or unit of government the debt obligations of either of which are owned by a trust. For the purposes of division (AA)(2)(a) of this section and for the purpose of computing the fraction described in division (AA)(4)(b) of this section, all of the following apply: (i) If the qualifying investee is a member of a qualifying controlled group on the last day of the qualifying investee's fiscal or calendar year ending immediately prior to the date on which the trust recognizes the gain or loss, then "qualifying investee" includes all persons in the qualifying controlled group on such last day. (ii) If the qualifying investee, or if the qualifying investee and any members of the qualifying controlled group of which the qualifying investee is a member on the last day of the qualifying investee's fiscal or calendar year ending immediately prior to the date on which the trust recognizes the gain or loss, separately or cumulatively own, directly or indirectly, on the last day of the qualifying investee's fiscal or calendar year ending immediately prior to the date on which the trust recognizes the qualifying trust amount, more than fifty per cent of the equity of a pass-through entity, then the qualifying investee and the other members are deemed to own the proportionate share of the pass-through entity's physical assets which the pass-through entity directly or indirectly owns on the last day of the pass-through entity's calendar or fiscal year ending within or with the last day of the qualifying investee's fiscal or calendar year ending immediately prior to the date on which the trust recognizes the qualifying trust amount. (iii) For the purposes of division (AA)(5)(a)(iii) of this section, "upper level pass-through entity" means a pass-through entity directly or indirectly owning any equity of another pass-through entity, and "lower level pass-through entity" means that other pass-through entity. An upper level pass-through entity, whether or not it is also a qualifying investee, is deemed to own, on the last day of the upper level pass-through entity's calendar or fiscal year, the proportionate share of the lower level pass-through entity's physical assets that the lower level pass-through entity directly or indirectly owns on the last day of the lower level pass-through entity's calendar or fiscal year ending within or with the last day of the upper level pass-through entity's fiscal or calendar year. If the upper level pass-through entity directly and indirectly owns less than fifty per cent of the equity of the lower level pass-through entity on each day of the upper level pass-through entity's calendar or fiscal year in which or with which ends the calendar or fiscal year of the lower level pass-through entity and if, based upon clear and convincing evidence, complete information about the location and cost of the physical assets of the lower pass-through entity is not available to the upper level pass-through entity, then solely for purposes of ascertaining if a gain or loss constitutes a qualifying trust amount, the upper level pass-through entity shall be deemed as owning no equity of the lower level pass-through entity for each day during the upper level pass-through entity's calendar or fiscal year in which or with which ends the lower level pass-through entity's calendar or fiscal year. Nothing in division (AA)(5)(a)(iii) of this section shall be construed to provide for any deduction or exclusion in computing any trust's Ohio taxable income. (b) With respect to a trust that is not a resident for the taxable year and with respect to a part of a trust that is not a resident for the taxable year, "qualifying investee" for that taxable year does not include a C corporation if both of the following apply: (i) During the taxable year the trust or part of the trust recognizes a gain or loss from the sale, exchange, or other disposition of equity or ownership interests in, or debt obligations of, the C corporation. (ii) Such gain or loss constitutes nonbusiness income. (6) "Available" means information is such that a person is able to learn of the information by the due date plus extensions, if any, for filing the return for the taxable year in which the trust recognizes the gain or loss. (BB) "Qualifying controlled group" has the same meaning as in section 5733.04 of the Revised Code. (CC) "Related member" has the same meaning as in section 5733.042 of the Revised Code. (DD)(1) For the purposes of division (DD) of this section: (a) "Qualifying person" means any person other than a qualifying corporation. (b) "Qualifying corporation" means any person classified for federal income tax purposes as an association taxable as a corporation, except either of the following: (i) A corporation that has made an election under subchapter S, chapter one, subtitle A, of the Internal Revenue Code for its taxable year ending within, or on the last day of, the investor's taxable year; (ii) A subsidiary that is wholly owned by any corporation that has made an election under subchapter S, chapter one, subtitle A of the Internal Revenue Code for its taxable year ending within, or on the last day of, the investor's taxable year. (2) For the purposes of this chapter, unless expressly stated otherwise, no qualifying person indirectly owns any asset directly or indirectly owned by any qualifying corporation. (EE) For purposes of this chapter and Chapter 5751. of the Revised Code: (1) "Trust" does not include a qualified pre-income tax trust. (2) A "qualified pre-income tax trust" is any pre-income tax trust that makes a qualifying pre-income tax trust election as described in division (EE)(3) of this section. (3) A "qualifying pre-income tax trust election" is an election by a pre-income tax trust to subject to the tax imposed by section 5751.02 of the Revised Code the pre-income tax trust and all pass-through entities of which the trust owns or controls, directly, indirectly, or constructively through related interests, five per cent or more of the ownership or equity interests. The trustee shall notify the tax commissioner in writing of the election on or before April 15, 2006. The election, if timely made, shall be effective on and after January 1, 2006, and shall apply for all tax periods and tax years until revoked by the trustee of the trust. (4) A "pre-income tax trust" is a trust that satisfies all of the following requirements: (a) The document or instrument creating the trust was executed by the grantor before January 1, 1972; (b) The trust became irrevocable upon the creation of the trust; and (c) The grantor was domiciled in this state at the time the trust was created. (FF) "Uniformed services" means all of the following: (1) "Armed forces of the United States" as defined in section 5907.01 of the Revised Code; (2) The commissioned corps of the national oceanic and atmospheric administration; (3) The commissioned corps of the public health service. (GG) "Taxable business income" means the amount by which an individual's business income that is included in federal adjusted gross income exceeds the amount of business income the individual is authorized to deduct under division (A)(28) of this section for the taxable year. (HH) "Employer" does not include a franchisor with respect to the franchisor's relationship with a franchisee or an employee of a franchisee, unless the franchisor agrees to assume that role in writing or a court of competent jurisdiction determines that the franchisor exercises a type or degree of control over the franchisee or the franchisee's employees that is not customarily exercised by a franchisor for the purpose of protecting the franchisor's trademark, brand, or both. For purposes of this division, "franchisor" and "franchisee" have the same meanings as in 16 C.F.R. 436.1. (II) "Modified adjusted gross income" means Ohio adjusted gross income plus any amount deducted under divisions (A)(28) and (34) of this section for the taxable year. (JJ) "Qualifying Ohio educator" means an individual who, for a taxable year, qualifies as an eligible educator, as that term is defined in section 62 of the Internal Revenue Code, and who holds a certificate, license, or permit described in Chapter 3319. or section 3301.071 of the Revised Code. (KK) "Professional employer organization," "professional employer organization agreement," and "professional employer organization reporting entity" have the same meanings as in section 4125.01 of the Revised Code. (LL) "Alternate employer organization" and "alternate employer organization agreement" have the same meanings as in section 4133.01 of the Revised Code. (MM) "Casino gaming" has the same meaning as in section 3772.01 of the Revised Code, "lottery sports gaming" has the same meaning as in section 3770.23 of the Revised Code, "sports gaming" has the same meaning as in section 3775.01 of the Revised Code, and "video lottery terminal" has the same meaning as in section 3770.21 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5747.062. As used in this section: "Transferee" has the same meaning as in section 3770.10 of the Revised Code. "Recipient" includes a transferee. "Lottery prize award" does not include a prize award from a video lottery terminal and does not include winnings from lottery sports gaming, except that "lottery prize award" includes winnings from lottery sports gaming wagers placed through a terminal described in division (B)(3) of section 3770.24 of the Revised Code. (A)(1) Before making any other deduction required by Chapter 3770. of the Revised Code, the state lottery commission shall deduct and withhold an amount equal to three and one-eighth per cent for calendar year 2025, after the effective date of this amendmentSeptember 30, 2025, and two and three-quarters per cent for calendar year 2026 and thereafter of the payment from each lottery prize award payment that is of an amount for which reporting to the internal revenue service of the amount is required by section 6041 of the Internal Revenue Code, as amended. (2) On or before the tenth day of each month, the state lottery commission, and each transferee required to deduct and withhold amounts pursuant to section 3770.072 of the Revised Code, shall file a return and remit to the tax commissioner all amounts deducted and withheld pursuant to this section during the preceding month. (3) On or before the thirty-first day of January of each year, the state lottery commission, and each transferee required to deduct and withhold amounts pursuant to section 3770.072 of the Revised Code, shall file with the commissioner an annual return, in the form prescribed by the tax commissioner, indicating the total amount deducted and withheld pursuant to this section or section 3770.072 of the Revised Code during the preceding calendar year. At the time of filing that return, the state lottery commission or transferee shall remit any amount deducted and withheld during the preceding calendar year that was not previously remitted. (4) The state lottery commission, and each transferee required to deduct and withhold amounts pursuant to section 3770.072 of the Revised Code, shall issue to each person with respect to whom tax has been deducted and withheld by the commission or transferee pursuant to this section or section 3770.072 of the Revised Code during the preceding calendar year, an information return in the form prescribed by the commissioner. (B)(1) Division (B)(1) of this section does not apply to persons classified for federal income tax purposes as associations taxable as corporations. Amounts withheld pursuant to this section or section 3770.072 of the Revised Code shall be allowed as a credit against payment of the tax imposed pursuant to section 5747.02 of the Revised Code upon the lottery prize award recipient, upon a beneficiary of such a recipient, or upon any investor in such a recipient if the recipient is a pass-through entity or disregarded entity, and shall be treated as taxes paid by the recipient, beneficiary, or investor for purposes of section 5747.09 of the Revised Code. The credit is available to the recipient, beneficiary, or investor even if the commission or transferee does not remit to the tax commissioner the amount withheld. (2) Division (B)(2) of this section applies only to persons classified for federal income tax purposes as associations taxable as corporations. Amounts withheld pursuant to this section or section 3770.072 of the Revised Code shall be treated as a credit against the tax imposed pursuant to section 5733.06 of the Revised Code for the tax year immediately following the date on which those amounts are deducted and withheld, upon the lottery prize award recipient, upon a beneficiary of such a recipient, or upon an investor in such a recipient if the recipient is a pass-through entity or disregarded entity, and shall be treated as paid by the recipient, beneficiary, or investor on the date on which those amounts are deducted and withheld. The credit is a refundable credit and shall be claimed in the order required under section 5733.98 of the Revised Code. The credit is available to the recipient, beneficiary, or investor even if the commission or transferee does not remit to the tax commissioner the amount withheld. (3) Nothing in division (B)(1) or (2) of this section shall be construed to allow more than one person to claim the credit for any portion of each amount deducted and withheld. (C) Failure of the commission or any transferee to deduct and withhold the required amounts from lottery prize awards or to remit amounts withheld as required by this section and section 3770.072 of the Revised Code shall not relieve a taxpayer described in division (B) of this section from liability for the tax imposed by section 5733.06 or 5747.02 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5747.063. The requirements imposed under this section are in addition to the municipal income tax withholding requirements under section 718.031 of the Revised Code. As used in this section, "sports gaming proprietor" and "sports gaming facility" have the same meanings as in section 3775.01 of the Revised Code. (A)(1) Subject to division (F) of this section, if If a person's winnings from casino gaming or from sports gaming are an amount for which reporting to the internal revenue service of the amount is required by section 6041 of the Internal Revenue Code, as amended, a casino operator or sports gaming proprietor shall deduct and withhold Ohio income tax from the person's winnings at a rate of three and one-eighth per cent for calendar year 2025, after the effective date of this amendmentSeptember 30, 2025, and two and three-quarters per cent for calendar year 2026 and thereafter of the amount won. A person's amount of winnings from casino gaming shall be determined each time the person exchanges amounts won in tokens, chips, casino credit, or other prepaid representations of value for cash or a cash equivalent. The casino operator or sports gaming proprietor shall issue, to a person from whose winnings an amount has been deducted and withheld, a receipt for the amount deducted and withheld, and also shall obtain from the person additional information that will be necessary for the casino operator or sports gaming proprietor to prepare the returns required by this section. (2) If a person's winnings from casino gaming or sports gaming require reporting to the internal revenue service under division (A)(1) of this section, the casino operator or sports gaming proprietor also shall require the person to state in writing, under penalty of falsification, whether the person is in default under a support order. (B) Amounts deducted and withheld by a casino operator or sports gaming proprietor are held in trust for the benefit of the state. (1) On or before the tenth day of each month, the casino operator or sports gaming proprietor shall file a return electronically with the tax commissioner identifying the persons from whose winnings amounts were deducted and withheld, the amount of each such deduction and withholding during the preceding calendar month, the amount of the winnings from which each such amount was withheld, the type of casino gaming or sports gaming that resulted in such winnings, and any other information required by the tax commissioner. With the return, the casino operator or sports gaming proprietor shall remit electronically to the commissioner all the amounts deducted and withheld during the preceding month. (2)(a) A casino operator or sports gaming proprietor shall maintain a record of each written statement provided under division (A)(2) of this section in which a person admits to being in default under a support order. The casino operator or sports gaming proprietor shall make these records available to the director of job and family services upon request. (b) A casino operator or sports gaming proprietor shall maintain copies of receipts issued under division (A)(1) of this section and of written statements provided under division (A)(2) of this section and shall make these copies available to the tax commissioner upon request. (c) A casino operator or sports gaming proprietor shall maintain the information described in divisions (B)(2)(a) and (b) of this section in accordance with section 5747.17 of the Revised Code and any rules adopted pursuant thereto. (3) Annually, on or before the thirty-first day of January, a casino operator or sports gaming proprietor shall file an annual return electronically with the tax commissioner indicating the total amount deducted and withheld during the preceding calendar year. The casino operator or sports gaming proprietor shall remit electronically with the annual return any amount that was deducted and withheld and that was not previously remitted. If the identity of a person and the amount deducted and withheld with respect to that person were omitted on a monthly return, that information shall be indicated on the annual return. (4)(a) A casino operator or sports gaming proprietor who fails to file a return and remit the amounts deducted and withheld is personally liable for the amount deducted and withheld and not remitted. The commissioner may impose a penalty up to one thousand dollars if a return is filed late, if amounts deducted and withheld are remitted late, if a return is not filed, or if amounts deducted and withheld are not remitted. Interest accrues on past due amounts deducted and withheld at the rate prescribed in section 5703.47 of the Revised Code. The commissioner may collect past due amounts deducted and withheld and penalties and interest thereon by assessment under section 5747.13 of the Revised Code as if they were income taxes collected by an employer. (b) If a casino operator or sports gaming proprietor sells the casino facility or sports gaming facility, or otherwise quits the casino or sports gaming business, the amounts deducted and withheld and any penalties and interest thereon are immediately due and payable. The successor shall withhold an amount of the purchase money that is sufficient to cover the amounts deducted and withheld and penalties and interest thereon until the predecessor casino operator or sports gaming proprietor produces either a receipt from the commissioner showing that the amounts deducted and withheld and penalties and interest thereon have been paid or a certificate from the commissioner indicating that no amounts deducted and withheld or penalties and interest thereon are due. If the successor fails to withhold purchase money, the successor is personally liable for payment of the amounts deducted and withheld and penalties and interest thereon, up to the amount of the purchase money. (C) Annually, on or before the thirty-first day of January, a casino operator or sports gaming proprietor shall issue an information return to each person with respect to whom an amount has been deducted and withheld during the preceding calendar year. The information return shall show the total amount deducted from the person's winnings by the casino operator or sports gaming proprietor during the preceding calendar year. (D) Amounts deducted and withheld shall be allowed as a credit against payment of the tax imposed by section 5747.02 of the Revised Code and shall be treated as taxes paid for purposes of section 5747.09 of the Revised Code. This division applies only to the person for whom the amount is deducted and withheld. (E) The failure of a casino operator or sports gaming proprietor to deduct and withhold the required amount from a person's winnings does not relieve the person from liability for the tax imposed by section 5747.02 of the Revised Code with respect to those winnings. And compliance with this section does not relieve a casino operator or sports gaming proprietor or a person who has winnings from casino gaming or sports gaming from compliance with relevant provisions of federal tax laws. (F) A sports gaming proprietor that offers lottery sports gaming through a terminal described in division (B)(3) of section 3770.24 of the Revised Code shall not withhold amounts under this section from winnings from wagers placed through that terminal. The state lottery commission shall withhold amounts from those winnings under section 5747.062 of the Revised Code. (G) The commissioner shall prescribe the form of the receipt and returns required by this section. The director of job and family services shall prescribe the form of the statement required by this section. (H)(G) The commissioner may adopt rules that are necessary to administer this section. Sec. 5753.01. As used in Chapter 5753. of the Revised Code and for no other purpose under Title LVII of the Revised Code: (A) "Casino facility" has the same meaning as in section 3772.01 of the Revised Code. (B) "Casino gaming" has the same meaning as in section 3772.01 of the Revised Code. (C) "Casino operator" has the same meaning as in section 3772.01 of the Revised Code. (D) "Gross casino revenue" means the total amount of money exchanged for the purchase of chips, tokens, tickets, electronic cards, or similar objects by casino patrons, less winnings paid to wagerers. "Gross casino revenue" does not include either of the following: (1) The issuance to casino patrons or wagering by casino patrons of any promotional gaming credit as defined in section 3772.01 of the Revised Code. When issuance of the promotional gaming credit requires money exchanged as a match from the patron, the excludible portion of the promotional gaming credit does not include the portion of the wager purchased by the patron. (2) Sports gaming receipts. (E) "Person" has the same meaning as in section 3772.01 of the Revised Code. (F) "Slot machine" has the same meaning as in section 3772.01 of the Revised Code. (G) "Sports gaming facility" and "sports gaming proprietor" have the same meanings as in section 3775.01 of the Revised Code. (H) "Sports gaming receipts" means the total gross receipts received by a sports gaming proprietor from the operation of sports gaming in this state, less the total of the following: (1) All cash and cash equivalents paid as winnings to sports gaming patrons; (2) The dollar amount of all voided wagers. (3) Receipts received from the operation of lottery sports gaming on behalf of the state under sections 3770.23 to 3770.25 of the Revised Code. (4)(a) On and after January 1, 2027, but before January 1, 2032, ten per cent of the promotional gaming credits wagered by patrons; (b) On and after January 1, 2032, twenty per cent of the promotional gaming credits wagered by patrons. As used in division (H) of this section, "promotional gaming credit" has the same meaning as in section 3775.01 of the Revised Code. When issuance of a promotional gaming credit requires money exchanged as a match from the patron, the deductible portion of the promotional gaming credit does not include the portion of the wager purchased by the patron. (I) "Table game" has the same meaning as in section 3772.01 of the Revised Code. (J) "Taxpayer" means a casino operator subject to the tax levied under section 5753.02 of the Revised Code or a sports gaming proprietor subject to the tax levied under section 5753.021 of the Revised Code. (K) "Tax period" means one twenty-four-hour period with regard to which a casino operator is required to pay the tax levied by section 5753.02 of the Revised Code and one calendar month with regard to which a sports gaming proprietor is required to pay the tax levied by section 5753.021 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5753.07. (A)(1) The tax commissioner may issue an assessment, based on any information in the tax commissioner's possession, against a taxpayer who fails to pay the tax levied under section 5753.02 or 5753.021 of the Revised Code or to file a return under section 5753.04 of the Revised Code. The tax commissioner shall give the taxpayer written notice of the assessment under section 5703.37 of the Revised Code. With the notice, the tax commissioner shall include instructions on how to petition for reassessment and on how to request a hearing with respect to the petition. (2) Unless the taxpayer, within sixty days after service of the notice of assessment, files with the tax commissioner a written petition signed by the taxpayer, or by the taxpayer's authorized agent who has knowledge of the facts, the assessment becomes final, and the amount of the assessment is due and payable from the taxpayer to the treasurer of state. The petition shall indicate the taxpayer's objections to the assessment. Additional objections may be raised in writing if they are received by the tax commissioner before the date shown on the final determination. (3) If a petition for reassessment has been properly filed, the tax commissioner shall proceed under section 5703.60 of the Revised Code. (4) After an assessment becomes final, if any portion of the assessment, including penalties and accrued interest, remains unpaid, the tax commissioner may file a certified copy of the entry making the assessment final in the office of the clerk of the court of common pleas of Franklin county or in the office of the clerk of the court of common pleas of the county in which the taxpayer resides, the taxpayer's casino facility or sports gaming facility is located, or the taxpayer's principal place of business in this state is located. Immediately upon the filing of the entry, the clerk shall enter a judgment for the state against the taxpayer assessed in the amount shown on the entry. The judgment may be filed by the clerk in a loose-leaf book entitled, "special judgments for the gross casino revenue tax and sports gaming receipts tax." The judgment has the same effect as other judgments. Execution shall issue upon the judgment at the request of the tax commissioner, and all laws applicable to sales on execution apply to sales made under the judgment. (5) If the assessment is not paid in its entirety within sixty days after the day the assessment was issued, the portion of the assessment consisting of tax due shall bear interest at the rate per annum prescribed by section 5703.47 of the Revised Code from the day the tax commissioner issued the assessment until the assessment is paid or until it is certified to the attorney general for collection under section 131.02 of the Revised Code, whichever comes first. If the unpaid portion of the assessment is certified to the attorney general for collection, the entire unpaid portion of the assessment shall bear interest at the rate per annum prescribed by section 5703.47 of the Revised Code from the date of certification until the date it is paid in its entirety. Interest shall be paid in the same manner as the tax levied under section 5753.02 or 5753.021 of the Revised Code, as applicable, and may be collected by the issuance of an assessment under this section. (B) If the tax commissioner believes that collection of the tax levied under section 5753.02 or 5753.021 of the Revised Code will be jeopardized unless proceedings to collect or secure collection of the tax are instituted without delay, the commissioner may issue a jeopardy assessment against the taxpayer that is liable for the tax. Immediately upon the issuance of a jeopardy assessment, the tax commissioner shall file an entry with the clerk of the court of common pleas in the manner prescribed by division (A)(4) of this section, and the clerk shall proceed as directed in that division. Notice of the jeopardy assessment shall be served on the taxpayer or the taxpayer's authorized agent under section 5703.37 of the Revised Code within five days after the filing of the entry with the clerk. The total amount assessed is immediately due and payable, unless the taxpayer assessed files a petition for reassessment under division (A)(2) of this section and provides security in a form satisfactory to the tax commissioner that is in an amount sufficient to satisfy the unpaid balance of the assessment. If a petition for reassessment has been filed, and if satisfactory security has been provided, the tax commissioner shall proceed under division (A)(3) of this section. Full or partial payment of the assessment does not prejudice the tax commissioner's consideration of the petition for reassessment. (C) The tax commissioner shall immediately forward to the treasurer of state all amounts the tax commissioner receives under this section, and the amounts forwarded shall be treated as if they were revenue arising from the tax levied under section 5753.02 or 5753.021 of the Revised Code, as applicable. (D) Except as otherwise provided in this division, no assessment shall be issued against a taxpayer for the tax levied under section 5753.02 or 5753.021 of the Revised Code more than four years after the due date for filing the return for the tax period for which the tax was reported, or more than four years after the return for the tax period was filed, whichever is later. This division does not bar an assessment against a taxpayer who fails to file a return as required by section 5753.04 of the Revised Code or who files a fraudulent return, or when the taxpayer and the tax commissioner waive in writing the time limitation. (E) If the tax commissioner possesses information that indicates that the amount of tax a taxpayer is liable to pay under section 5753.02 or 5753.021 of the Revised Code exceeds the amount the taxpayer paid, the tax commissioner may audit a sample of the taxpayer's gross casino revenue or sports gaming receipts, as applicable, over a representative period of time to ascertain the amount of tax due, and may issue an assessment based on the audit. The tax commissioner shall make a good faith effort to reach agreement with the taxpayer in selecting a representative sample. The tax commissioner may apply a sampling method only if the tax commissioner has prescribed the method by rule. (F) If the whereabouts of a taxpayer who is liable for the tax levied under section 5753.02 or 5753.021 of the Revised Code are unknown to the tax commissioner, the tax commissioner shall proceed under section 5703.37 of the Revised Code. Sec. 5753.08. If a taxpayer who is liable for the tax levied under section 5753.02 or 5753.021 of the Revised Code sells a casino facility or sports gaming facility, disposes of a casino facility or sports gaming facility in any manner other than in the regular course of business, or quits the casino gaming or sports gaming business, any tax owed by that person becomes immediately due and payable, and the person shall pay the tax due, including any applicable penalties and interest. The person's successor shall withhold a sufficient amount of the purchase money to cover the amounts due and unpaid until the predecessor produces a receipt from the tax commissioner showing that the amounts due have been paid or a certificate indicating that no taxes are due. If the successor fails to withhold purchase money, the successor is personally liable, up to the purchase money amount, for amounts that were unpaid during the operation of the business by the predecessor. Section 2. That existing sections 718.031, 718.08, 3123.89, 3123.90, 3770.03, 3770.06, 3770.07, 3770.071, 3770.073, 3770.10, 3772.01, 3772.02, 3775.01, 3775.02, 3775.03, 3775.04, 3775.041, 3775.051, 3775.06, 3775.09, 3775.10, 3775.12, 3775.14, 3775.15, 3775.16, 3775.99, 5747.01, 5747.062, 5747.063, 5753.01, 5753.07, and 5753.08 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed. Section 3. That sections 3770.23, 3770.24, 3770.25, 3775.05, and 3775.11 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed. Section 4. Upon the effective date of this section, the Ohio Casino Control Commission shall do both of the following: (A) Remit to each person who held an active type A, type B, or type C sports gaming proprietor license or an active mobile management services provider license, and who paid licensing fees associated with the license pursuant to section 3775.04 or 3775.05 of the Revised Code as those sections existed immediately before the effective date of this section, a portion of the fees paid by the person with respect to the license on a prorated basis as determined by the Commission in consideration of the time remaining in the term of the license on the effective date of this section; (B) Determine whether each person who held an active type A, type B, or type C sports gaming proprietor license immediately before the effective date of this section faithfully made all payments required by Chapter 3775. of the Revised Code, as that chapter existed immediately before the effective date of this section, up to that date. The Commission shall issue each such determination in writing within six months after the effective date of this section. (1) If the Commission determines that the person made all the required payments, the Commission shall return to the person the amount that the person gave to the state as a surety bond pursuant to section 3775.04 of the Revised Code as that section existed immediately before the effective date of this section. (2) If the Commission determines that the person did not make all required payments, the Commission shall return to the person the amount that the person gave to the state as a surety bond pursuant to section 3775.04 of the Revised Code as that section existed immediately before the effective date of this section, minus the amount of the required payments that the person did not make. Section 5. This act shall be known as the Save Ohio Sports Act.